I think an equally real problem is the media - they are how we learn about things in the world - and they've proven we can't trust them.  I would have no problem with Zimmerman getting 50 million from NBC for doing this to him  http://video.foxnews.com/v/1537812030001/did-nbc-news-lie-in-trayvon-martin-reporting/  it's a Fox link but still.....
[Hi.](http://memedump.com/d/1225-8/yo-dawg-xzibit-48.jpg)
yeah,im going to keep at it till i get the shirt!
[Here you go] (http://www.reddit.com/r/fffffffuuuuuuuuuuuu/comments/j4m5d/nipple_rage/)
[Is this better?](http://i.imgur.com/dM0M0.png)
Thanks! I tweaked some timing issues and awkward gaps :)
Noooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooo
Once in a while I still get toys from cereal boxes. I recently got a Justice League comic book too lol
Mudkipz. I liek them.
You know the Arby's logo on some signs, that's supposed to be a cowboy hat? When I was younger, for some reason, that NEVER occurred to me. Every time I looked at it, all I saw was two people standing underneath a sheet. The taller man is looking down at the woman as they stand by one another.   One day, in the car, I mentioned this to my father, when the most incredible natural phenomenon occurred. My father, with only the faintest flicker of a glance at my brothers, communicated with them on some ethereal plane, ordering them to stay quiet.   "That's right," he told me. "See, the founder was Jewish, and they're only allowed to make love once a year underneath a sheet. One year his wife told him if he wanted to make love to her that year, he'd have to have a successful restaurant chain first." He then paused, and my eldest brother added, "Well, you know how Jewish women are!"  I was in my mid-twenties before I realized my father had trolled me in a terribly racist way. About a year after that, I began to think of all the other times in my life I'd mentioned my theory, now expanded to include an angry Jewish wife, and how NOBODY have ever corrected me.   In short, my friends and family are dickwads.
http://i.imgur.com/xAcwR.png
I saw him in desperado and dusk till dawn, then rodriguez put him in his kids movies too.  You can't get a machete wielding maniac who rapes women (Con Air) out of your head when watching spy kids.
I was busy bartending at work and I was explaining certain drinks to a group of ladies. I was speaking kind of fast and tripped over some of my words. One of the ladies made fun of the way I talked and asked if I ever had a speaking problem.   I tell her that I did and that struggled with it my whole life and that in school I was tormented for it. I shed a few tears and quickly excused myself. As I left I heard the other ladies jump on her and scold her.  I'm a dude, I can fake cry, and I've never had a speech impediment.  *edit for grammar
No XBMC, no update.
The only congressman who has any regard for our personal rights is Ron Paul [7].
[I will just leave this here.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8l_cCKLHRoo)
Steroid kids are real bad, mkay?
&gt; So, if no one is capable of understanding God's decision making process, than all religions are wrong  This is a remarkably unsupported statement.  Go ahead and make your case.
I have some older stuff up, but you may be right, I'll try to put together a set.
I never viewed fragmentation as a development problem as much as a selling phones problem.
Now that's what I call an annulus. 
Would'a been more pimp if he didn't have the nose... remember he lost it dueling for a girl which he did not get to pimp.
While it's not as poetic as Ovid, you should definitely check out [Apollodorus.](http://www.amazon.com/Library-Mythology-Oxford-Worlds-Classics/dp/0192839241) He's the go-to guy for most things related to Greek Mythology.
Except you aren't actually drowning them, only tricking the brain into thinking it's drowning. It's a psychological effect more so than a physcal one like you would get from traditional torture methods. That was my point, it is torture light, but still torture. The point is that actual real torture is happening in our other facilities, so the last thing I am worried about is people getting scared by having water poured on their face while a doctor stands guard to make sure you aren't injured.
yea, america sucks ass, murica! where idiocy and ignorance abounds! don't come here guys, we suck
I'm not arguing in support of the policy, dude. I'm just saying a ban on mods does not affect "all gamers."
happy cake day brah have an upvote
There a way, don't delete it.  :D
How??
Hopefully they'll notice the power of boycott, look at how well FIFA and BF3 did even with people not buying, and look at how poorly ME3 did!
Big ups for transplant fans.  I lived for two years in Northern Virginia and attended a Wings-at-Caps game in the Diamond-Dee-Bwoi.  I felt like an OG as I was probably one of maybe a handful of Wings fans there that actually lived in the city and grew up in the SE Michigan region.
Counterpicking involves more runes/mastery strategy.  For example if you are midding against an ad champion you want to beef up on armor for runes.  If they have a lot of cc you can try to get some mobility early game so if you get stunned or snared. You can easily outrun them towards safety.  Pay attention to their skills and how they utilize them, if you go within a certain range, will they attack? If so, think about a way you can counterattack them and take the least amount of damage.  A good example is lanewick, the only way he can wittle you down to low health is to q you and run away.  You won't be able to harass this champion effectively so your best method is to freeze the lane under the turret.
I think I lose about 5 IQ points when someone says that...
i hate how california has become synonymous with freedom.  such vapid bullshit.  that said, the song wasn't too bad.
I can get you one of these:  close combat growlithe, dark pulse zorua, dark pulse deino, interested?  edit: nasty plot smoochum, trying to think of others off the top of my head while hatching eggs. haha
Where the fuck are we? [6]
True that, Tolkein inspired so much of high fantasy. But the armor in the Peter Jackson film looks almost identical to Orcish armor in Skyrim is all I was trying to say, not saying Bethesda are shitbags for doing it and are the only ones who are influenced from LOTR or something like that. 
Woosh
what happened?
Pay for some good internet then. It takes 5 minutes at the most.
Mafia. As in the first, as someone else suggested.  Slow cars, driving from one mission to the next is required, as is driving back, great music score, great atmosphere. I loved that game to bits.
I liked the Rome reunion with Caeser and Mark Antony.
&gt;'ve worked retail, and when you've got a back-up of some sort, you don't just ignore the customers waiting in line. You say "Hey folks, sorry the wait is so long, we're having an issue with our computer/issue with the phones/issue with whatever!" and that lets the customers know you're not just being a bunch of jerks and that you do realize that they are inconvenienced.  But you can see that they are working, that entire song and dance is about customer satisfaction, mostly for idiots who can't use their eyes.
I did 93 deadlifts yesterday ramping up with a top set of 255lbx20 plus 5 sets of 155lbx10. I'm doing 5/3/1 BBB by the way.  Obviously, 255lb is not very close to my max, so the lesson here is that you can do lots of deadlifts as long as the intensity is rather low. Intensity means percentage of your 1RM.  When you work close to your 1RM and weights get heavy, you'll be happy to only do one set.
This, we're cool again. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=W8ffWsLQcTE
[](/darkleunimpressed)
I wanted to like that comment.
OH HELL NO BIATCH. Can't hide MY flair.
My fiance isn't making millions, and we have a lot of combined debt. We need to save money in case we want a family and house, which we both think we do. Losing my income (even though it is minimal) and spending however much a year going to community college would be a pretty big hit financially.   Even then, an Associate's degree isn't exactly worth a lot and I'd probably need to go to a 4-year university, so we'd have to move. If my fiance gets a job teaching at a university of his choice that'd be great, but if not, I'm not going to ask him to quit his job just so I can try and fix some of my past mistakes. It's not fair to him.  Even though I'd like to have a career, I need to look at the bigger picture. Life isn't perfect and I can't have everything I want. I'd have to give things up.   In the long run, I doubt it'd be beneficial financially. A GED won't look good on a college application and even though I'm a hard worker, I'm kind of stupid and won't do well on the ACT/SAT/any tests I have to take despite studying, so it's unlikely I'd get into a decent college.
thank you very much, it honestly means a lot. 
chubby wubby
Nice..  Fucking love Rogan..
Lease says the complex can regulate the manner of all parking.  Then it mentions the policies at the time the lease was signed.  No language limits the ability of the complex to change its policies; instead it does the opposite.  So like Moon says: yes they can.
CRACK MY $25 BOTTLE OF BLACK CROWN
[Here's](http://www.sbs.com.au/news/article/1637849/%27US-alerted-over-Bales-behaviour%27) a more extended video report of the investigation by Dateline Australia.
Rarely does a comment on reddit make my jaw drop and render me speechless for a bit.  This one did.
He also in a lot of other episodes.
Keep reading...
eww an orchestra!
Have some fun with a sharpie
Haha let's bash Java some more.  How about you do this when something relevant comes up?
Here is the text from this meme pic for anybody who needs it: &gt;Title: I've spent too much time here &gt;Meme: Scumbag Brain &gt;* Wants to go to a website besides Reddit  &gt;* Instinctively types "re", clicks on reddit &gt; ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||Wants+to+go+to+a+website+besides+Reddit+-+Instinctively+types+%22re%22%2C+clicks+on+reddit)] This is helpful for people who can't reach Quickmeme because of work/school firewalls or site downtime, and many other reasons ([FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/)). More info is available [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/).
&gt; but I don't think I would enjoy doing those actions  That's the point, though. Many women are propositioned in public places, even ones not typically aimed at meeting partners. This is ok, but then if you say no, you get a tirade, yelling, even threats. Does this happen to men who don't return the advances of a woman on the street or in a shopping mall? when it does happen to those men, are the women in a legally secure situation? I think you'll find the kind of sexual entitlement men experience is far, far less public and possibly even less pervasive.   The quote is a little over the top, but in the context from which it was taken--a character screaming about what a male character did *in her house*--it's fairly reasonable. Still, I think there's enough merit to it outside thats situation to provide some thought-provoking discussion on sexual entitlement and gender, and the appropriateness of courtship and propositioning based on locatoin. 
I've just fried them in a very little oil over high heat, usually when I've been drinking and dont want to cook anything fancy. I've had them blackened before, but am not sure how that works. Maybe someone can weigh in?
EA: Rental gaming at its worst. This is exactly why I pirated the game this time. I bought ME1 and ME2 but once they decided that you can only rent the game from them that is when I decided to drop EA like a bad habit. That is all EA is, one giant video game rental service where you pay premium price for a game that they dictate when you play, how you can play, and how long you can play. Sad thing is, you KNOW that many employees at EA read reddit and I would even assume some upper level management, yet their love of money has them saying, essentially, fuck you gaming community. 
I'm so sorry I called your names! I've done the same thing before....I removed my post where I called you a p.o.s. because you are obviously not one!
Lizzy Caplan? She actually played a minor role alongside Zooey Deschanel in The New Girl. I don't find her to look much like any of them. 
Who's the attractive guy on the right?
Touche my good sir.
That's not really 'movement', more 'commands'.
Again and again!
I made tea. Best idea ever. Would do again
Agreed on the first part. Cormac McCarthy can write books without quotation marks and you still know who is talking and what is and isn't dialog. Grammar is, in my opinion, a binary state in fiction: it's either not distracting and understandable, or distracting and confusing. 
I'm an addictive person. Heroine on a daily basis would kill me. I have issues with self control. When I told my buddies how much Incense I had been smoking lately. They thought I was fucking crazy. I'm just one of those people who has to tell his dealer not to sell to him at certain times. Or I'll bankrupt myself. I have no self control, and I acknowledge that. The only thing I can do really is to get people to control my intake. (Which was the problem with Incense. Those fuckers didn't care how many times I walked through the door each day)
The original Descent did this too.  The instant you typed Gabbagabbahey it disabled your score.
This is exactly my theory - the goatees seem to have some significance for being evil. Evil Abed, Evil Troy, Dean Pelton in the first EP trying to be stricter, VD Laybourne in the last episode... And yeah, I was thinking that a lot of things could also be only happening in Abeds imagination. Look at last episodes "continuity error" of Jeff and Annie changing clothes, etc...   My rudimentary theory, somehow pieced together from some other comments i made here: I actually thought the last shot in last episodes ending clip would first show the Vice Dean, but then in the last frames, may be reveal him as evil Abed, but even without this fact, maybe revealing the way Abed deals with his conflict with Troy, replacing his own behaviour that caused Troy to be mad at him with intrigues by the evil (as implied by his goatee) Vice Dean because he is more able to cope with something not being his fault.... We know this is somehow established canon for Troy and Abed and present in their minds, since Troy explained about the evil-Goatee concept in 'Advanced Gay' ("but evil Inspector had a moustache and was kinda rapey"), so what if the Vice Dean (maybe even being revealed as an Incarnation of Evil Abed, hence the moustache) driving a wedge between them actually poses as some sort of sublimination (right term? dunno) for Abeds "evil side" which he cannot accept: his 'insufficient social skills' and his behaviour that caused the fallout with Troy, which was actually the reason for their friendship breaking up. I don't think EVERYTHING that happens in the series happens in Abeds mind, but certain aspects might be altered in his point of view to diminish his fault... Do I make any sense? It's kinda late here in Germany...   Edit: clarity, as usual
tldr
Nevermind.
haha I wish I was in THAT movie!
Ah, so this is how far you have to scroll down to find someone who isn't obsessed with her.  High-five buddy!  I can think of tons of girls I would rather see GW.
Well our ID also has the location on it which isone the point of it. But why can't you just get a new state ID with the old one from a different state?
I don't agree with you but I will upvote you for writing out an explanation. 2001 Miami included *17 1st round draft picks and 6 All Americans*. There were multiple guys on that team who have a shot at the NFL hall of fame. We were a more talented team and I believe we would have won, but the only thing I am sure of is that there is no way in hell Ed Reed allows you to "roll".
Or have it be the last guy in the line
That was weird, I actually enjoyed how awkward that was and watched it three times.
I'm absolutely lovin that clip.
i shouldn't have laughed as much as i did
[Johnny Cash - Sunday Morning Coming Down](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ED5s1-Fe9FA)
lol, interesting. Where do I go every day to work, almighty one?
True, but for mothers of small children it might be nice to have a salad. I know I'll sometimes get the salad while my kids eat junkfood.
If this is what makes you WTF then you must live a very sheltered life.
I understood all of that. But why is that a sucky time? Early evening right? What's the problem?
yes and nice legs
Ssssssss.....ooooooohhhhh.....
A fire extinguisher would be completely useless against that fire. Also, how many people do you know that have fire extinguishers in their cars? 
Onion. 
/16 weeks  This is certainly a gray area. Honestly, it isn't a simple issue. Rape, financial insecurity, and (as you mentioned) bodily integrity are real problems that affect everyone involved. I don't have a black and white answer for you. We need to disagree well and compromise. 
Wow, well done!
I think everyone here is trying to explain a grown up's perspective to you. A grown up doesn't bring up a downer like a dog's health concerns in a totally unrelated picture. That's something that a know-it-all child or someone with autism does...you know, people who have no concept of social graces.
One time I was laying in bed, about to fall asleep, and he opened my door and asked me "so when was the last time you prayed before you went to bed" he proceded to walk in, kneel down infront of my bed and demand me to kneel down and join him in prayr. When we were "done" he asked talked to me about all the times we use to pray when I was little. I mentioned that I didn't remember and he said "pray to God and he will help you remember".
IT'SSS MUURRDDDAA...
*tone: interested*  Contrary to the other posted opinions here, I'm interested to see this discussion. I actually haven't read any Sherlock fanfiction but want to, so I'm interested to hear people's recommendations.
Nope, you just apply for a tourist visa. 
Would you care to explain what you mean by "No" or do you prefer looking like you have kindergarten level debating skills?
hi, first thank you a lot for your words, they help so much .  it has been two weeks.  &gt;she made you feel inadequate  yes, exactly, thank you, i have been searching a whole week for this sentence to know/describe how i feel, but i couldn't come up with it on my own, the other feeling i was sure off is what have experienced your self, being Free, not being judged has never been so amazing, i got judged by people due to several stuff in my life but i always knew how to deal with it, and never let it bother be, but having that done to me by her was killing me without me knowing it.  &gt;I drink milk out of the carton, I pee with the door open, I stay up until 2 am.  these things have never been so enjoyable for me even though they are not new, i felt really bad every time i did any of them, or watched a funny meaningless  video on youtube, are something alone, etc; every aspect of my life and habits were being watched and judged for no good reason.  I really don't understand why would a person judge another person that they "love" on such small things, they are just differences and people are different, why can't people just accept that ? maybe it's part of the controlling behavior, maybe not, but it's definitely not easy.  &gt;I haven't found a perfect potion to cure it.   right now am not thinking about the perfect portion at all , all i want to have won from this is not to regain my confidence and spirit and to know how to avoid such a person that will treat me in such a way in the future, which i hope that you do for yourself as well.  am going to try to do what you do and write when i get the chance to, i read a lot that it helps.
You mean you're now a widower? 
awww, that is so awesome.  good work.  i love how you had so little information to go on, but everything made so much sense.  good show!
Yea --I know what you mean.  Gotta get that out of your mind (fight it).
http://www.reddit.com/user/bogatyr  What do you think? "Girls are Stupid"
Started season 1 last night continuing today. Damn what a coincidence.
Legion clearly tells us that the Geth became influenced by the reaper code, for some reason we had no option to use their own code against them 
Here's a list of places to eat/drink I made a while ago for my friends that were visiting:   Places to go in Shanghai:  DRINK: - Barbarossa - Mural - Scoreboard - Zapata's - Glamour Bar - I Love Shanghai - People 7 - C's  EAT: - Cantina Agave - MAYA - Simply Thai - Whisk - Gourmet Cafe - Blue Frog - Pier 39 - Big Bamboo  CLUB: - M2 - M1NT - Park 97 - Bar Rouge - Shelter - Sky - Muse - Obama  Hopefully you can find this useful. Otherwise, check out smartshanghai.com, they usually have very good recommendations for expats. 
How about fuck you?
last nights jimmy fallon.
Tragedy of the commons.
Normal for worgen.  Maybe this will actually cause Blizzard to fix the race.  What am I talking about, ofcourse they won't...
It would be nice if we could fire the scatter shot in first person view. The CPU never seems to get the aim right.
Doesn't string theory hypothesize 12 dimensions?   I once tried reading the non-mathematical explanation of string theory and could not understand it at all until I started reading the mathematical explanation. Even after that, my understanding is extremely superficial...
"add visor". Ron MacLean, you crack me up.
We're not talking about low bar or Rippetoe-style squats. We're talking about Olympic-style: high bar to maximum possible depth. Or front squats: high on chest to maximum possible depth.  Raised heels matter in such situations because they change the lever arrangements sufficiently that maximal depth can be achieved without breaking the alignment of the lower spine.  This is kinda sorta *important*.
What all loving parents should do (so long as their kid isn't a felon lol).
Im still cracking up from this image! I love Michael's expression at the end
Same here
Why do American cops always ask for ID when they want to abuse people? Can they actually do something with it, or is it just a form of intimidation?
Selena!
The [Wayne Train](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=suNw31Kxviw&amp;feature=relmfu) scored with his face this afternoon
Go to google and change it to street view... hahahaha!
Mother of god.
How about Woody Alien?
[XKCD *hates* you.](http://xkcd.com/977/)
Hmm. Seems the anus is quite a popular choice for user names these days.
Downvoted, this is really disrespectful.
As expected, most Rules Lawyers won't even recognize themselves as being such.  It has little to do with manipulating the wording and playing semantic games and more to do with their over inflated egos and the way they go about their lives.  
:D
Oh snap, just won a free iPad. 
Here's my theory: in one of the rumors floating around, the scene was between Pierce and Abed, Abed does something nice for Pierce (I think makes a computer game easier?) and he's touched by it and gives Abed a hug. That kind of thing comes from deep in Harmon's soft underbelly, under the gruff prickly asshole. Chevy insults the scene and says it's not funny, then refuses to even shoot it. That's what touches off the spite and rage from Harmon, Chevy basically says "fuck your sappy stuff, I'm not doing it".
I think this is referring to jews and their stinginess with money? I don't know, could be wrong.
Smart Investment. In a couple years their value will at least triple!  Maybe.
By your logic,you're saying that just because my father cheated on my mother, and denies he has a 21 year old son to his new girlfriend, I'm bound to never stay in a faithful relationship?  Completely untrue. 
Charlie Talley has said that star san becomes a yeast nutrient when the pH rises.  I'd say one ounce will be absolutely fine.
how is this legal?
My boyfriend says the same thing. &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
yes, be careful not to do it too fast. Oh man... my calves were stiff like hardwood and I walked like a Satyr
Yeah, I have to wonder how blind someone would have to be to claim that. Apple is the largest company in the world, with income a magnitude larger than Google, hiring the smartest software engineers and marketers on the planet. If he thinks that Apple couldn't figure out how to make apps scale well, then I've got a bridge to sell him.   But, beyond that... and I *really* hate invoking Ad Hominem... but he says stuff like:  &gt; It just means you, as a developer, need to properly write your code.  Almost as if he's demeaning the developers who do complain about fragmentation. "You're not working hard enough". And that would be fine criticism if it were coming from a triple-A, multiplatform developer like Rovio, Zynga, or Nimblebit. But it's coming from [this guy](https://twitter.com/#!/anujahooja); an "Android developer", "Google Fan", and "Open Source Advocate". None of these things gives him any authority on the subject of comparing Android's development process to that of iOS/WP7, and all of these things favorably predispose him toward Android.
Purrdy
He is. It feels great. 
Weather is awesome! Leaving Tsukuba soon! Hope to see everyone there! :D
Im so glad I'm not te only one who noticed haymitch didn't fall off stage. Faith restored in humanity
I guess I can't really speak for many other colleges, but I went to an engineering school and most classes lasted 2 hours (well, 110 minutes), but there were also a lot that went on for 3. My brother and sister both went to liberal arts schools and I think it was the same for them too.
not bad, not bad
sauce?
Not sure who downvoted you. Just answering a question with facts.   Reddit is filled with blind, willfully ignorant assholes sometimes...
Buses are by and large completely awful. In my city, service stops at 5:30-6 on weekdays, and 4:30-5 on Saturdays. No Sundays. Drivers leave when they want, and occasionally do some food shopping en route...a number of routes don't even run during the middle of the day, and service to most places takes at least 30 min when it should be 5 or 10 min. I have used transit in several cities ranging in size and have yet to find a satisfactory experience. I dream of the day privatized bus systems closer to taxis could operate. 
Qualifying can add +2 to their HB for me. There are certain personality traits and interests I find attractive.
You're a fucking saint.  Never change you beautiful bastard you.
Have you ever considered taking an etiquette class or two? I'm sure you're fine just as you are, but if you feel a need to add to your cultural capital perhaps you could look into some basic etiquette lessons. There's also guides (Miss Manners) in print and online. I'm sure he doesn't dread taking you out, it's just your insecurity bringing you down. And just so you know, start from the outside in. 
What are the pros?
ah the new transformers in japan is out is see
Because he's a head coach who is black.
Honestly Robert Baratheon should have been the Phillies, the Rangers the White Walkers, and the Twins as Khal Drogo.  The Phillies have dominated the NL for the past few years, but have gotten old and stagnant offensively, and are probably on their way out.  The Rangers were irrelevant and never paid any attention for years and years, but have now emerged as a pretty serious threat.  The Twins were a pretty strong contender for a few years previously and were looking really strong for a while, but are dead in the water now.
Girls love scars. Esp ones that have an epic story behind them. Even if it doesn't make it up.  How about this?  I was walking through a park at night on my way home and I heard some muffled shouts. I went to see what was happening and there was a guy holding a knife to a girls throat attempting to rape her. I kicked him off her and got into a scuffle and he attacked me with his knife, but I gave the girl just enough time to get away.  This makes you look like a great caring guy to all the ladies and then dickheads like him wont give you shit for it because everyone will think they are low for attacking someone that was willing to put themselves in danger for a stranger.   Also, guys like this just like attention, you were right not to get into an argument about it but next time come up with a cool story.  AS you get older people will become more intrigued by you and your scar and less judgemental.  Chin up :)
More please?
Wait, what? [0]
Yep. Parts from Silverados 88-97 are pretty much interchangeable because the body style didn't change.
Yeah, I actually do do that.  I tried a 180 a few mins ago, and almost wished I had a helmet, lol!
With or without the hurling of shit? What am I saying, it wouldn't be GG without the risk of getting hit by flying shit. 
Soooo what your saying is...Your a beta?
You pop up every-fucking-where. Proactively stalking me? Going to the threads I want before I get there?
This is why you don't fucking link to dropbox.
God dammit this is right near my house.
Single and ready to tingle
your an Idiot.
How is it a hipster flick?
What the fuck is wrong with her teeth?
yes :)
Couldn't agree more. Retreated where possible, secured himself and dependent, used deadly force when inevitable. 
I still have my fingers crossed!
It might be embedded. It's hard to taste much else after that beer. But in a good way.
I think he was suppose to be acting like Shane. He was right, but he didn't do/say it right.
Then you don't know any. [Here's a list](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_Christian_thinkers_in_science) of Christian scientific thinkers past and present.  Believing something that's foolish, even astoundingly foolish does not make someone an idiot.  For example, you believe that every single person who believes in God is an idiot no matter what. This is astoundingly foolish. I would wager, however, that you are probably very intelligent.
Oh my god, that was glorious! Especially the Xin and Garen! I would love if you make more!
You can buy Lite Salt in the spice section of any supermarket. It's half sodium and half potassium. Tastes no different than regular salt.
Heh, "pickier"....
As you already have an attorney, make sure you let him know that you deal with these issues already, and that the results of these false accusations are taking a toll on you mentally. Armed with this, you might expect to be able to sue them for more than just defamation. They are assaulting you, albeit mentally, and that's wrong on so many levels. It'll be a tough road, but you'll come out on top in the end.
'Obla Di, Obla Da' gets me at the part where their kids are playing in their yard
I think as long as you can accept that it is a Baptist school, and so you have to put up with things like chapel, christian scriptures, and most of the professors (even in the science depts) talking about god, you'll be fine.  Honestly, once you get through Freshman year, where you are stuck in the residence halls, you can find a decent group of friends who accept you for who you are and avoid the people who don't.  That was my experience. :)
He played Final Countdown exactly 20 turns before. On the 20th turn my jinzo - returner attacked directly after I drew my second malevolent nuzzler. Activated limiter removal and that was game!
You classy motherfucker. Downvotes reversed.
Where do these stairs go?  ...  They go up. 
Kids don't do this anymore? Shit, I must've been like the last generation or something.......  I let the nostalgia get the best of me.
By an inch or a mile, winning is winning.
Yeah... I don't see why he's making such a big deal out of it.
Am i the only one who thinks the fact that chuck e cheese sells beer is kinda not wright i guess.. I mean yea lets take our kids there get drunk and drive them home.. 
The enemy's gate is DOWN!
Yeah I know, I'm just saying that adding a retractable roof to any stadium is a costly proposition or I think a lot more teams would do it when they built new stadia.
Then Repeat.
Well which one is it?
There are only two Google Image Search results for "comma broski". [This](http://i.imgur.com/20zMT.jpg) and [this](http://i.imgur.com/3uv0n.jpg), in that order.
Yeah, she guessed Teddy though, or something alone those lines. She didn't guess it :(
Ah i see. Lol no idea, they were just the lucky ones who i picked to link to.
Have you heard of these things called planks?   They're pretty underground, so I wouldn't expect YOU to have heard of them.   You should do them.
tried doing it, but the power button stopped working :( 
I usually agree with police, but this guys an asshole and deserves to be fired.
Am I that beautiful?
That's not what predetermination means, also a weatherperson does not know for certain what will happen, not does he have the power to change it
They are actually making fun of themselves in a way. Because most people who "listen" to ska can only name Reel Big Fish and Streetlight Manifesto. They know they aren't the only ska band ever
Wow, I've never seen that before. All I've seen from the pre-Brady years are photos of her on stage, with co-stars, or with Presidents.
I looked into the Pods thing. It was more than twice the cost of a uhaul.
TAKE HIM BACK
YES! my point exactly. that is seriously funny
n1
Looks like he's flashing the 'Spocker'.
While the court is modeled after the post-World War II Nuremberg Tribunal, it carries no legal weight.
its worth about $200-$250 according to another thread 
I'm sorry, am I not at *liberty* to post what I want on the subreddit of *Liberty*?
Pics of friend!
Chip and Dale is pretty darn tough!
You still need to account for the A and B power feeds. If two of them are plugged into the A feed and you loose that. A world of pain will await you.   The fastiron switches can take up to 8 power supplies. 
Why wouldn't you advise taking drugs? As you said, it's only hard the first few times you overcome anxiety barriers (though it will likely always be hard for someone with a sever issue). If drugs let you change your behaviour it lets you learn beyond just the medication.
Bullshit.  If anything, taking the time to write a short statement and not going to the White House shows more focus than going.  But that's really beside the point.  The point is he insulted your (and everyone's) favorite mulatto and you can't deal with it.  Edit: I find it funny that all these fags are downvoting me while knowing full well that I'm completely correct.  Keep jerking, boys.
I am guessing the prank here is that your story never took place...?   because technically, yours was not a prank. it began with a lie and then it moved into a disquieting territory for which I don't have words, English not being my first language. don't get me wrong; it is an interesting story. but that's not a prank.
seamless transition!
Amelie is one of the most romantic movies ever. :)  So yeah, if both of you don't want to wrap yourselves around each other after that (and delicious home made pizza, WHAT), then it was not meant to be!
Oh man.. I did this back with 5.. I just get the upgrades every year or so and even the upgrades can take a while
Watts are super fun, nice choice. They also have a lot of potential to troll the meta this format!  Running Hopperlock will be full of fun and laughs. Running triple photon lead and inferno reckless summon. Run a sangan and triple veilers. What this means is that with your Upstarts, PoDs, and your Cobras if you search for a Hopper, photon lead and then reckless summon they can't do anything to you anymore minus field wipes or negation. (Dark Hole, Torrential Tribute, Lightning Vortex, Solemn Brigade) From there on you're free to ping them to death with your Cobra or such!  Dragonfly with a hopper in hand can do essentially the same thing as photon lead + inferno reckless. Same with One for One + Reckless or One for One + ramming a dragonfly.  Messenger of Peace is fairly sub par this format, you're better off running cards like Waboku or Threatening Roar to stall.
Emphasized, to your choosing.
If you link to dropbox and make the front page, you're going to have a bad time
I've noticed there are some trans people who will act flamboyant and use "tranny", and a lot of trans people have to deal with people being uninformed and ignorant for their whole lives, so they get used to friends using the word. It's easy to see how someone may have never been told not to use "tranny" and gotten comfortable with the word, being slightly jarred by the new (to them) term "trans".  The cool thing is, people like [1curiousgeorge](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/rmtod/most_awesome_waitress_ever/c473e6e) do take the time to educate the uninformed, and most people respect their friends, loved ones, or the human race enough to correct their behavior.
It doesn't matter what kind of antenna you have. The signal being transmitted is [ATSC](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/ATSC). New TVs have a built in decoder for ATSC but for older TVs you need a so called "converter box". It doesn't convert anything. It simply decodes an ATSC signal and outputs video/audio to your TV in the form of [HDMI](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/HDMI), [Composite](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Composite_video), or [Component](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Component_video).
"I only have two hands!"
Please crosspost this to [/r/RonPaulCensored](/r/RonPaulCensored) 
well go for it, can never have too much of a good thing
All My Friends- LCD Soundsystem  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=AcyHYbhHdYI
In Canada, we learn about American political figures insofar as their role in global events and relations with Canada. For each of the Canadian prime ministers between 1910 and 1990, we had to learn about the corresponding American president and what went on between them. Highschool social studies and history focuses more on Canada's role in global events and Canadian history, and anything learned about American presidents and political figures falls into one of those categories.
Touché.  I think the score stands 1-1.
I worked at a large supermarket as a cashier. One day, an upper middle class white family came up to my line. They had a child about 4 years old. Every time a black person would walk by my register, the kid would point at them and scream. This happened a few times, each time the parents would step in and try to tell the child that they were being rude. when i finished the family's order, they rushed out of the store as fast as they possibly could without running. 
Anyone know what that rolly thing at 11:00 is? I need one.  Also WOO! FBM
'Trolling' on Facebook is like having those people that 'hack' on Facebook by having to go through the ridiculous process of using a keyboard when someone else is signed in.   It doesn't mean what they think it does and annoys the rest of the internet because of it.
This is unlikely to happen for quite some time, since on average one Boomer died for every 43.6 savages killed before they settled the base.
Slow drivers (I don't even have a license, I hate them anyway!).
This synced perfectly with the music I'm listening to and as a result I'm practically dying of laughter. 
Sometimes.... dead is better
Not illegal to OC in Boulder County.
I appreciate that! It just makes me wonder sometimes you know?
I was that guy ಠ_ಠ
In any and all circumstances?  I'm honestly interested, because too many "pro-lifers" are also pro-death penalty, which seems a little hypocritical.
[](/allmybits "This is the most appropriate time to use this emote.")
Come and join
If you tilt the screen you can read it perfectly...
Is the rest of the college Greek oriented?  You may end up in a very small clique where the non Greeks outnumber you.  You'll end up seeing the same frat guys over and over at mixers.   Pledging can eat up a lot of free time. Have you joined any other clubs or sports?  Does your school have "professional" frats?  Coed ones that are usually aligned with your major?  I know there was a business frat and I think a journalism one.   They are social and you have something more substantial in common with your sisters. 
also all of South Park is on netflix, if you're a fan
It's all pink inside
Would you advocate for some sort of regulation of the cocaine market that is bound to exist regardless of prohibition, so that the assholes on cocaine do less harm to themselves and society?
Im sorry but my curiosity is getting the better of me. I have already heard the song and I am now begining to question wheather I will read it or not. 
this is a brilliant idea.
Whoever has been upvoting or downvoting didn't click the link.  &gt;Illegal variable _files or _env or _get or _post or _cookie or _server or _session or globals passed to script.
Me too.
&gt; Sandra Fluke got called a slut for expecting to get reasonable prescription drug coverage that was part of her tuition,   This is utterly false.   What a shock.  You defend a worldview that is built on fabrication.  It was insulting to call her a "slut" ... it was insulting to sluts all over, who have earned their name.  She is a moocher that wanted what she was not entitled to.  In doing what she did, she provided an object lesson on the insanity that is the left.
I'm pretty sure it has to do with forms of Greek rather than Latin.
Most old people aged 70+ are not much more than overgrown, self-absorbed, selfish children. 
Emma Watson is a Limey sloptart. She gets spammed here so much I've started to have double vision when I see her I see her and an image of Rosie O Donell superimposed over her. 
While we're on the subject of coke; back when Torres was in Edmonton apparently he tore a mirror off the bathroom wall at a popular bar and did a few lines off it
Definitely. Thankx for the help. Not many people this understanding on here. =)
Posting for TRUTH. Yum yums are the shit when you're stoned.
&gt;[As for the name: I've seen some concern that the name 'truegaming' is meant to be a dig at r/gaming, a way to assert ourselves as the 'true gamers'. Not so. I don't identify myself as a 'gamer', just someone who's played games for 20 years and has a fondness for talking about them. The name is meant as a reference to truereddit, which sees itself as a Reddiquette-based version of reddit.com that frowns on karma-farming. I had hoped that the name 'truegaming' would communicate all of that succintly, not to separate people or identify ourselves with some ideal of what a gamer should or should not be like. I'll reiterate: truegaming is not in competition with gaming. It is a companion subreddit to take the load off the default by providing a place for people to talk about games outside of the current/recurring trends.](http://www.reddit.com/r/truegaming/comments/ickws/lets_talk_about_truegaming/)
no it didn't, its even lamer than it already was  edit: how the fuck does anyone even ride mongo, shit looks awkward
That's really sad. 
I find this the most attractive photo Ive seen posted to gw...
Black people cant absorb heat and heat the Earth at the same time. It's all the white people reflecting that heat unto the Earth that's causing global warming.
Thats awesome.
Thanks for the info. I really like the USB charging option. I'll be sure to look at both lights before I make my purchase. Cheers!
This is probably going to sound totally made up, but several years ago, I was on a 7 day white water canoe trip.  During a particularly difficult portage, a pair of underwear fell out from under one the canoe's air bladders (white water canoes have these to they stay afloat even when half full of water).  So, I stuff it back under the air bladder and keep going.  That damn pair of underwear fell out every time I had to portage the canoe, and each time, I stuffed it back under the air bladder.  When I got to the end of the route, and was returning the canoe to the rental place, the owner told me that Justin Trudeau had rented that very canoe just before I did.  He had returned it mere hours before I had picked it up.  So, I went camping with Justin Trudeau's underwear. Yeah!
Putting bad and dubstep in the same sentence is pretty redundant.
I SWEAR I had One Note open!
And, by experience from childhood games like Telephone, what the fuck would be the message that reached the last person?
Eh, not necessarily. People in regions with no team close by to support generally get a pass as well. If I were you I'd switch to being a Thunder fan at some point, may be misconstrued as bandwagoning, but fuck it, local support in sports is important IMO.  When we're kids we generally become fans of teams for arbitrary reasons, or of the teams that are most visible on TV (aka the winning ones). When I was very young I adapted the Hornets (despite having a local team, though one that was never that good or on TV) as my team because I loved Muggsy Bogues because he was short. I stuck with the Hornets until the end of middle school (the Baron Davis/Jamal Mashburn years), when I realized I now actually had a local product worthy of supporting (2001, when Kidd was traded here).  Sounds a bit like bandwagoning as well, but I view it as getting over my childish fan ways. People that say "well I've been a Cowboys fans since as a kid even though I live in Philadelphia" don't get a pass from me. At some point you have to grow up in a way (again, speaking to people only in regions with teams) and realize that your reason for rooting for a team as a young kid no longer holds water as an adult.  But that's just my opinion.
I lold at this before it was a repost
See Johnny, you don't want to breath air, or you'll end up like them. They breath air, look how it turned out for them.
Why the downvotes when I just want to know who she is? :(
Don't freeze them. I wouldn't call myself a "professional" but I've been a barista for 3 years and we have always been instructed to advise people to not freeze the beans. Moisture and light are the beans' worst enemy. Store them in as much of an airtight container as possible in the back of your pantry so they are dry, in room temperature, and in the dark.
Not good brands of cheese and pre-sliced/shredded cheese has a lot more preservatives than fresh-cut.
This at a Hooters?
Amanda Palmer love!
yes and people tend to be infinitely complicated, even if on the surface you may initially perceive them to be simple, underneath the social mask there's typically alot going on
Unfortunately no browser except safari renders it perfectly. We have to submit bugs and wait..
Please...
&gt; There are uninformed people who think server merges is the end of a game  No, this really isn't accurate. Players are the only ones who react this way to server merge. The media, investors, etc. also react in the same way. When you have to shrink your service because you overestimated your userbase, then it's perceived as an issue.  I think they should have stuck to their guns and realized those 4 hour queues would have gone away in a week or two. Then you'd have everyone in a much more condensed community. But hindsight is 20/20.  They got greedy, opened up more servers because they thought the demand was there to fill them up. When in fact it was just a vocal contingent within the community that simply didn't want to wait.
No, it started in prison because they are not allowed to wear/have belts.
And make sure you put it on youtube. 
I highly doubt there's any real reward, but expect it's just some type of achievement system put in to add a little extra to the game.
Funny, I don't remember ever posting anything in support of Trudeau on Reddit. 
First Contact creates a causality loop and not a grandfather paradox.   In Yesterdays Enterprise Tasha travels back in time aboard the Enterprise C. Doing so alters the timeline and allows her to also die on Vagra II before the Enterprise D ever encounters Enterprise C. For both Tasha's to exist two separate time lines had to have at least briefly existed in parallel with each other. Yesterdays Enterprise doesn't deal with the Grandfather Paradox: If Tasha died on Vagra II who went back in time with the Enterprise C? It actually doesn't have to because it proves my point. The timeline that Tasha comes from in Yesterdays Enterprise is vastly different from our own timeline. It is an alternate version of events; an alternate timeline; an alternate reality. The only thing that is tricky in Yesterdays Enterprise is Guinan's realization that things "aren't right", but this is tricky in either case and Data postulates that we can't know how Guinan's race perceives time because we know little about them. In fact Guinan could be sensing the two realities splitting.  You set forth two rules:  &gt;When you go back in time, you get to exist there, even if you wipe out all the future, and your own parents, etc. Because you already went back in time. &gt; &gt;Everything you change effects your own time line.  Let's look at this from a scientific perspective. You set forth these rules as the undeniable laws of physics of the Star Trek universe. This would make them laws of Star Trek physics. They are in fact not laws but theories, and good ones based on observable phenomena. For them to be laws we have to know without a doubt that they not only explain the way things have always worked in the past but that they also explain how things always will work. We don't know that things have *always* worked that way and we certainly can't prove that they always will.  I don't even refute your first theory. I only alter it slightly in order to explain why it works:  &gt;When you go back in time, you get to exist there, even if you wipe out all the future, and your own parents, etc.*, b*ecause you ~~already went back in time~~ *have created an alternate reality*.  When you say:  ...because you already went back in time.  You are essentially saying "just because". You aren't attempting to suggest how it is possible that you can travel back in time when your point of origin no longer exists. I have built upon your theory to suggest an explanation.  As far as what shall now be known as "onyeartrip's second theory of time travel":  &gt;Everything you change [affects](http://grammar.quickanddirtytips.com/affect-versus-effect.aspx) your own time line.  I don't see any proof that this is ever the case much less *always* the case.  My argument is that your rules are arbitrary and your own, albeit based on some observable phenomena. I have taken it a step further to suggest a reason for your first theory and to refute entirely your second as based on no observable phenomena and only mere conjecture.  You also seem to think that saying those who control this universe have agreed with my theories is invalid. I argue that it is not. They have went out of their way in both the structuring of the plot of the new Star Trek and their explanations afterward to not only imply but to state emphatically that the Prime Universe still exists. What reason do we have to doubt them? The only argument that you put forth is that time travel in Star Trek ***always*** works a in a certain and inexplicable way. You have disregarded other more logical explanations because of your personal beliefs. Others (myself, Orci, Abrams, and Memory Alpha to name a few) have painstakingly went out of their way to explain why these beliefs are inapplicable. You refuse these explanations because of the way you *want* the Universe to work. I have attempted to explain an alternative to the way you adamantly insist that everything must work with my best understanding of science and logic. As you have said you are free to see the Universe in any way that you deem fit until "canon proof" exists to the contrary, and even then you can * personally* believe whatever you wish. I grow weary of the discussion and this has been my closing argument. If you chose to respond you will have the last word and I will read and consider it but will no longer respond in kind as I feel I have expended enough time on the subject. I feel as though we have come to an impasse, but I thank you for the discussion.  **EDIT:** Upon further thought I might alter onyeartrip's second law thusly:  From your perspective you usually seem to alter your own timeline.
[Oh the huge manatee!](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/LZ_129_Hindenburg)  Actually, the Hindenburg was filled with explosive hydrogen because Germany didn't have the technology to capture helium at the time. Obviously, modern blimps are much safer. The problem is that, efficient as they might be, they're just too darn slow and have too small a payload capacity to compete against airplanes.
I sincerely hope that was a troll, or at least sarcastic to some degree.  If not, I believe we should petition to have his degree invalidated, because he has obviously missed the point of college -- critical thinking.  This is the kind of thinking that has led to the insane madness that is "government budget cuts." Instead of cutting back on over-budgeted messes like the military and TSA, we talk about cutting a few million from small organizations that are actually useful.  I get that its an opinion piece, but surely an editor had to have looked at it. Something like this represents all of us, and the shortsightedness of the author, and anyone who allowed it to be published, is sickening.
His [facebook was hacked](http://www.metro.co.uk/news/853660-nicolas-sarkozy-resigns-after-facebook-page-hacked)
I wonder if he'd let you use it as a straw.
Certainly not for life.   35k in loans paid off off the normal 10 year cycle, in the 15 years I've been the workforce despite being laid off three times, I've made more money every year than my loan value and in the past 5 years more than doubled it.  Best investment I will likely ever make.  If you look at the average income of degreed workers vs those with none, and you plan on working more than 20 years in your field you can hardly go wrong. (gender studies degrees not withstanding)
Did we all suddenly agree that this is a book and not a teenage emotion fart?  
Only thing I did to mine was put Hogue rubber grips on it. I love mine.
Ah, that makes sense...to be honest I'm not entirely clear on the nature of the Antichrist, so I hope my questions aren't too horribly silly. 
Unfortunately, your submission has been removed for the following reasons:  * You did not include the image's resolution in the title. You should put the resolution in brackets at the end of your title.  For more information regarding these issues please [see the FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/BotanicalPorn/faq), and feel free to resubmit once they have been resolved. Thank you!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%23BotanicalPorn) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Thank you for responding. This is a recent protester who has had the good fortune to never come across this kind of brutality yet. 
by up you mean straight up towards my forehead?
Come on man, this isn't even a rage comic. Do you understand them, or do you need help finding a subreddit?
The intelligence and personality of both clown and huma huma triggers makes it worth having a tank just for one. 
The only time marijuana "kills" people is when people kill eachother over it. LEGALIZE IT!
From everything I've researched it seems a vast majority of venomous animals are susceptible to their own venom to a degree at least.   You can read more from the below two links.  http://www.thenakedscientists.com/HTML/content/latest-questions/question/1913/  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Snake_venom#Among_snakes  I can't speak to the other species however I have heard spiders kill eachother with their venom as well. DO note that the main reason they don't poison themselves is becauser the venom goes to their stomach, and not their bloodstream. One last note is that people can become immune to venom as well by slowly ingesting increasing amounts of it. I can't find a good article about it but Joel La Rocque is known for becoming mostly immune to many venoms over time.
that exists. http://www.minecraftforum.net/topic/892282-123-computercraft-131-now-updated-and-with-monitors/
Don't think she's appreciate that being out there.
All the while, Bethesda chuckles.
lol or in our case, the scope was picked up for $600 in 1975   :)
Ive recently started collecting both LOTR and warhammer. Would like the Space marines if possible, didn't even know you could still get pre heresy space marines. 
yo o fo sho no uglymofo
 I don’t even understand death beds. Who would ever buy one?
[Couldn't get this to post yesterday because my internet connection was cutting out.](http://i.imgur.com/gShL5.jpg) Also, this is my first post here. Hello. c:
Damn, I don't read good.
Hey, bagel chips. Get some bagel chips.
this makes me cringe. this is my sister 100%. 
Yet, here you are, caring way too much about what I believe.   I love sharing thoughts with friends so that they can in return share their thoughts with me. I challenge them, they challenge me. I give some debunking information, they give me rebuttal. All of us learn and grow wiser. I'm not sure why you see this as negative.   I'm also not sure why you are spending so much time trying to change my beliefs. 
Totally ripped off Bomb Hills Not Countries.
Close flash player.
I have a hard time seeing Bethesda wanting to "spite the fanbase".  That sounds more like EA.  Dragon riding/taming/training/etc. would be ridiculous because the lore is basically that dragons haven't been around in forever so how would they be able to practice?  Yes, they might have some faction like the blades that *used* to do it but all they'd have left is basically instructions and no dragons to actually achieve said goals with.  Therefore, we'd have a bunch of "riders" who didn't know for sure they could ride shit because they'd never even seen a dragon. In Helgan, some of the NPC's didn't even know they were looking at a dragon, it had been so long since they'd been roaming about.
Sarasota: "Fooooled yoooou!"
I thought the same thing.  [It's totally Bryan Cranston.](http://i.imgur.com/oHTRf.png)
Time for the markus
I agree, Dan crossed the line. Doing that in front of his family was childish and mean-spirited. We all know Harmon is a bit of an asshole, as he has repeatedly demonstrated on twitter, but it usually seems harmless and all in good fun. I'm not surprised at this whole thing though. Chevy is and has always been a dick. Every time one of the other cast members gets a "What is it like to work with Chevy?" question in an interview they kind of just awkwardly sidestep it and say "It's Chevy! He's a legend!" Then there was that one Paley panel where he kept interrupting and drawing attention to himself (while Good Guy Ken Jeong laughed his ass off the whole time). I felt like that kind of revealed the real dynamic between Chevy and the rest of the cast. I personally find him incredibly arrogant and unfunny, but I understand people love him and he is an important part of the show. Pierce is one of my least favorite characters on the show, but I actually really like the Pierce/Shirley pairing they're doing right now and I'm excited about that whole story line. Like Dan said in one of his tweets, we don't know the whole story and a lot of this might just be hype. I just hope they can resolve this and move forward amicably. First the hiatus, now this. Dark timeline indeed. God damn this show is so meta.
[When my American eyes see celsius measurements](/poker)
So that gives them the right to completely misrepresent something?
Yeah, if any of the naruto characters actually used any of the better abilities they possess it would have been too short of a fight.
But there is no crime.  And there is no hitting and running.  He merely jumped on top of your car, and then fell down the ground.  That's it.
Yeah, as soon as I got your message, I cleaned out the spam filter.
*tone: giddy*  You have no idea how happy this makes me.
Nicely done!  I haven't built a wheel in ages but it's definitely a satisfying process. I'd imagine it's the bike mechanics' version of knitting...  Hope it lasts well, don't forget to retension!
If you were a librarian, you'd be the sexiest librarian ever.
How has he gone his whole life and nobody has helped him out with this?
when i see something like this, I'm not entirely sure whether mankind  went in the right direction. Now that's what i call equilibrium.
Do they really put gelatin in the water to make people more full?
That's the whole problem.  To YOU it's important to be super duper sure what the text says because you are personally invested in the text.  There are thousands of ancient and totally contradictory holy texts about hundreds of other "gods".  There is no reason to think these texts are worthy of any greater scrutiny than you would give the Quran, the Book of Mormon, the non canon apocrypha, the Illiad, Oddessy, etc
What's your Steam ID?
Not at all. I'm really glad you pointed it out. There's nothing more important than consent (re. sex, obviously, oxygen probably wins out overall!) and I'd hate to think anyone was coming away from something I'd said believing otherwise. I like to think of myself as a warrior against the patriarchy; tearing it down one orgasm at a time! 
Man, I envy you. I'm having a lot of trouble understanding how statistics work. It became really interesting to me after reading Moneyball, but it still doesn't really help me understand it. 
I want to give you an internet hug 
File not found :(
Thanks, I'll have a look for them. :)
I didn't initially mean to do an emote, but that hat looks better than what I expected.  [Here's](http://imgur.com/IBxaD) my quick try at it.  Edit: Replaced it with a better version
The first time I heard it was at one of their shows (they're fucking *amazing* live, by the way), and it hit me really hard. Still have a tough time listening to it because it's just so sad.
Because some people are too lazy to get their own paper out (I'm guilty of this :/)
Awesome.
More often than anyone else. Slaves would often jump ship mid transport, drowning a dozen other slaves with them. Brazil had a good number of suicides as cane sugar was so valuable that a slave would pay for themselves within a year. Brazilian plantations were the worst in the new world. Cotton plantations needed slaves for a few decades before they'd pay for themselves.  The best way to ask this question would be societal norms concerning slavery and suicide. Keep in mind how many POW's killed themselves before they would be taken as a slave. Plenty of women killed themselves after sexual violence and plenty killed themselves before it could occur.
I hope that creep ended up in jail. That sucks and I'm sorry!
I disagree.  I find it hilarious. [This is WTF](http://i.imgur.com/R1oz9.jpg)  [Or this \(NSFW\)](http://i.imgur.com/5WAmq.jpg)
404 error file not found
any luck on that collection so far?
i'm so fuckin trolled by that guy
weird i feel the opposite. Whenever theres a friendzone or woman joke thread, the comment section is all about defending women and how its not funny etc. YMMV I guess
Have an upboat for sheer hilarity. Also, thank you for disarming those bombs. 
The result is great news. Congratulations.
"A soviet officer fabulously leads his men into battle" FTFY
i loooove peanut sauce, but i always sort of assumed there was some sort of restaurant secret talent that would make me unable to render it at home. thank you!
No, it is because American have rights given under the constitution called "Due Process".
Thank you for being one of the few people that actually understand what DE-motivational posters are
I too love that they change their sound. But the raw emotion and extreme chaos of Flamingo Trigger make me love it just as much as any other album.   How very ignorant to not like it cause "hipsters like to get all uppity "  grow up and make your own decisions. If you're not gonna like it, say YOU don't like it.
towel guy interview!
The fact that strangers on a website can make people feel better about a horrible event in their life is what makes Reddit truly great. Goodhearted people, take all my karma.
The account I read of that only points out to me that he wasn't hit and he didn't punch. Zimmerman's account almost verifies this, saying that his head was being slammed on the ground and that is the only bit of fighting that I heard him claim. I can't say that it isn't evidence that he is lying, but neither can you say that it is evidence that he is. What it says is what it says, the conclusions you draw from it have to take into account everything that it can mean.
Why isn't she?
Thanks for the kind words!. Actually yes, now that deadline is over, we might fix and polish the animation even further, we need some sleep first ;) as for the story, as it is, is how we planned it. We could add things that we removed because of time restrictions. But we'll see what happens from now on :)
kill it with fire.
Wanna see you cumming on a picture of some sexy tits!
He'd love that. You can tell how much he loves doing it. He was so excited to do my jellyfish because he's only done a few. Just a really nice guy. 
That's my inspiration. Problem is, doesn't say how he stuck it to the wall 
The eunuch is a power player man.  He may not always the the top dog, but he's always in the thick of it, at an advantageous position.  Exactly how I would describe the Angels.
http://winteriscoming.net/wp-content/uploads/2011/01/brandon-stark.jpg
people on reddit are foolish, and do not realize what it truly takes to run a country. let them sit in their perpetual state of ignorance and fake sense of moral superiority. 
Are you talking about the same [/r/MensRights](/r/MensRights) that was listed by the [Southern Poverty Law Center](http://www.splcenter.org/get-informed/intelligence-report/browse-all-issues/2012/spring/misogyny-the-sites) as a misogynist site?  As a sexual assault victim advocate and a feminist I can tell you first hand, MRAs (and/or you) aren't the only one that correct people about misconceptions about rape and sexual assault. 
Oh look it's this horrible idea again.  Why do they let dumb kids have internet?
Not if Shepard uses a paragon interrupt
I do find it it ironic that the insane bastard who thought it up, was given that very death. 
Lol, is this the onion?   I'm probably going to get down voted for this, but let me go ahead and explain why I think this statement might not be so bad.   I played mens volleyball in highschool on a couple of travel teams. It was in NYC, and the population of kids interested in seriously playing volleyball was small- so pretty much everyone knew each other. There were two guys we always knew were gay- we'll call them 'G' and 'C'. We were all fairly cool with them being gay (changing/sharing hotel beds with these guys made some guys uncomfortable, but nothing more than that). However- most guys seemed to be FAR more comfortable dealing with 'G' than 'C' - and this was really just due to the way that 'C' represented himself. He seemed to try to go far out of his way to make statements like "hey guys, I'm gay, look at me, I'm GAY!" (e.g., have you guys ever seen the shorts female volleyball players wear? they're [bootie shorts](http://www.fivb.org/Photos/VB/Gallery/GU18_03/day01/Screen/01.CZEvsUSA.05.JPG). 'C' would wear them sometimes, and it was a little odd).  He was especially flamboyant- and perhaps that was just his personality. However, 'G' didn't really mess with that stuff, he was just like the rest of us-with the exception that he liked guys.  He was great to be around, and we were all cool with him being gay.   I guess what I'm trying to say is that if you think "being gay" equates to "lets act as feminine as physically possible", you're going to make people uncomfortable. Should they be uncomfortable in the first place? Maybe not, but that's not my point.   **tl;dr: I'm from NYC- gay people are all over the place. We [the volleyball players] were totally used to seeing/dealing with /being friends with gay people. It's just that one of our gay friends seemed to try especially hard to show us that he was completely different, and that rubbed people the wrong way.**   //edit: I think I did a really poor job trying to explain what I was saying, so let me have another go. I'm not trying to say people should intentional stifle their personalities or whatever, that's not my point- what I'm trying to say is that of course, if you go out of your way to try to show people how different you are, you're going to bump shoulders.   I'm a Christian, and I know how dumbfoundingly irritating pointlessly outspoken bible-thumping Christians can be. Should a Christian run up to people they don't know to yell things like "YOU'RE GOING TO HELL"? I think that would make most people uncomfortable, despite the fact that  the person doing the yelling might actually believe that, and his/her personality might allow such a thing.   Similarly, when a gay guy wears girls volleyball shorts -just for example- it makes a few heterosexual guys uncomfortable. I feel that this view would be fairly reasonable among straight guys. 
STOP MAKING SENSE. FUCK, NOW I'M ACTUALLY FUCKING CONCERNED. 
I have not tried to date anyone, get laid, or fap for the duration as its important to go through the entire three months without getting off.  Also, if you have an eReader, pvt message me your email.
According to the original story, if there were long arguments OOC, it was not playing out characters.  We go back to TryUsingScience's original comment that sparked all of this.  &gt; Was the big reveal really worth a year of annoyance?  Fifteen minutes of an 'aha' moment do not justify headaches every week for a year. The players could be trying to forget a bad test, or relationship issues, or dozens of other problems by having a fun night. Instead, they get stuck with Mr. Annoying.  Just because someone has a reason for being annoying does not make it a valid or justified reason. This was not some friends avoiding another friend while they set up a surprise party. This was several people being upset for months so that one person could chortle internally about how clever they are.  If this is fine by you, I don't see a reason to continue this conversation.
OMFG THIS MUSIC IS AMAZING
The black one had nice claws too
I love my job, but there are times I just don't want to be there, and it shows.  I cant fault the man too much without being a hypocrite.
yeah, she had a great chemistry with the group. I guess she could have been the one if the show did got renewed for more seasons. The writers could have come up with a great story of moving forward using the demolition of the building, Zoey's divorce and Ted &amp; Robin parting away to make room for his relation with Zoey.
Cat's in the Cradle by anyone who covered this song
Amazing how different the moon looks like from the other side.  I guess we are all used to seeing it from just that one side.
Not sure if this is what you're talking about, but I unapologetically hate races like "Tough Mudder" or "Warrior Dash." If you're gonna run, run.
Age | User | Title | Reddit | Cmnt | Points :--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:-- 4 months | [carlojmp](/user/carlojmp) | [I should have tried this at school](http://www.reddit.com/r/gifs/comments/mflx7/i_should_have_tried_this_at_school/) | here | 11 | 300 4 months | [jofosho](/user/jofosho) | [How to pass a note like a boss](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/mah6z/how_to_pass_a_note_like_a_boss/) | [/r/funny](/r/funny) | 14 | 344 5 months | [Strakallion](/user/Strakallion) | [Cheating Like a Boss](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/ldk7t/cheating_like_a_boss/) | [/r/reddit.com](/r/reddit.com) | 7 | 101 * See **10 more** matches at [KarmaDecay](http://karmadecay.com/r/gifs/comments/rmys7/how_to_pass_notes_like_a_boss/)  *This is an automated response*   [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/help/faqs/SimilarImageBot) | [Send Feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Feedback Id rmys7&amp;message=[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/rmys7/\) 'I like feedback') | [Report Error](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Error Id rmys7&amp;message=[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/rmys7/\) 'Help me grow')
I checked on my PS3, didn't see it there or on the Vita store.
That's really good 
I'll give you the flamethrower for 1 refined.  Add me at "M00NBarker"
Grace, sin, holy...sound like bullshit made up words to me.  It are literally words without meaning to me.
Berkeley is the coolest town on this Earth. As long as you like laid back, acid dropping vegans. I love it there. 
4 out of 4 employees at my CVS sit in the back of the room and talk, ignoring the two lines full of people, the drive through line, and the ringing phone. all laughing out talking on their cell phones. I only pick up prescriptions after 11pm now. There is one guy and he actually does his job. Takes 5 minutes every time.
check tomorrow (or press wait and check in twenty seconds)
Of course the test was incorrect. I'm not leaving it to Mythbusters to break the laws of physics.
No, I didn't say "Go f*ck yourself with a book". However, I am saying, that you should maybe start digging into how modern operating systems and file systems work before you make such weird statements.  When you have drivers lots of drivers on your hard disk which are never loaded, based on what logic should that slow down your machine? And a virus scanner doesn't need to touch these files as well, since they haven't been modified since the last scan and they can modified by a superuser anyway.  Unless you're working with Administrator privileges all the time, there is no point scanning system files for viruses since they cannot be modified with your user rights. Any process that you start - on purpose or through a malware - always inherits your user privileges and can hence only harm your files.  Furthermore, I don't see why games and internet browsers slow down because there are many files on your hard disk. The operating system kernel is smart enough to keep currently used files in the [disk cache](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Page_cache) (in RAM - the Linux kernel actually does this much better, it uses all free memory for disk caching - not using any free memory is just a waste) and thus all accesses to these files are fast. An additional technique is [prefetching](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Prefetcher) where the kernel makes predictions on which files are likely to be accessed in subsequent operations and already loads them into memory.  As for the file system. Modern file systems have also many techniques to store large amount of data. While large files can be allocated in so-called [extents](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Extents), small files are packed together into the same logical sectors or even directly stored in the [MTF](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Master_File_Table#Internals).  As for the advantages of Windows 7 over XP, I already left a statement in [another comment](http://www.reddit.com/r/windows/comments/rfl1b/windows_xp_is_the_killer_liteweight_os/). There is also an [extensive article on Wikipedia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Features_new_to_Windows_7).
I hope your moment of thunder was worth it because to be honest i dont give a flying monkeyfuck. :D
i gotcha there bro thats When people fap, they tend to tighten their grip as time goes by, because everytime you're desensitizing your junk more and more. By the end you need a really tight grip to feel something good, this is called the Death Grip. I asked the same question a few days ago and this is the exactly reply someone gave me
Dammit Luke you still owe me that dinner......
Super super cheap korean side dish/breakfast: Chop green onions, scramble with 3-4 eggs, 2sp of h20 and 1Tbsp of fish sauce. Microwave in bowl with lid on for ~3-4min. Drizzle with sesame oil and eat. Add sriracha if you like.   Traditionally this is cooked like a crepe and rolled but i like it simple and easy. Either way it's always dirt-cheap.
mmm like this? http://i.imgur.com/ud5Av.jpg
Not all the time.  I'm black and if someone called me a nigger I'd laugh and tell everyone that person is an idiot.  If anything I'd be embarrassed to use that word (especially if I were white) lest someone think I'm an ignorant POS.
&gt; Wait, seriously? The general public calls out and shames males all the time.  No, it doesn't. It only shames those males that have lost their status as male by acting too feminine or not cis or white enough. They're free for shaming because they're not males any more, but some sort of mongrels. Discrimination doesn't count as something that demales a male and is therefor something that people won't be shamed over.
Snarky Yellow Text is it's own entity, completely divorced from Kurt's own mind.   Long live SYT.
Someone playing poorly doesn't invalidate the line of thought.  Those people don't understand the idea, they're just parroting what they hear the pro's/reddit/ the forums say. There's little you can do for people that don't apply basic critical thinking skills to the "lessons" they hear.
I waited tables for a long time at a big time (Australian themed) chain and have seen other servers deal with some crazies but I can honestly say I haven't had too many bad customer's aside from one drunk bitch that tried to cuss me out but I just rolled my eyes and walked away which sent her through the roof. Im 6'4 and i think standing over people kind of keeps them from getting snippy. The one that sticks out in my mind is this (its more amusing than anything). I worked in a town in Louisiana that has several huge ass casinos (like Vegas style) that makes people drive over from Texas for the weekend. One Sunday I got these two middle aged redneck lesbians come in and they were adamantly trying to find out if we took debit cards. I assured them we did but they said "we asked the hostess too, we gotta make sure." I told again it was fine. So they order, get their food and and eat. When I get the check they hand me their debit card. When I swipe it....boom, declined. Swiped it again...declined. So I bring it out to them and I'm sure you've already guessed "Do you ladies maybe have a different card becau..."  "We asked you if you took debit cards! It didn't work because you don't take them! "   "No ma'am. (I take out MY debit card) I've have paid for food with this on numerous occasions."  " we want a manager!"  So the manager (who's a friend of mine) goes over and comes back with a credit card. When he swipes it....boom, declined. He exclaims: "That's the problem they don't have any fucking money!"  After much talking they finally use a check that, somehow, cleared. Clearly they knew they didn't have any fucking money and were trying to get over on us.
it's a baby with big eyes. How isn't that cute? 
I went to a talk given by LeVar Burton. And it was epic -- between the anecdotes about him growing up with sci-fi books, Mister Rogers and Gene Roddenberry, I was just on the edge of my seat all night.  And then he asked if the audience knew the Reading Rainbow theme. This was a very silly question, and we all sang for him.
What happens is likely going to depend on the woman's reaction. If she spends 5 minutes telling the cop about how much of a creep this guy is and how dangerous it was to leave her there, the officer might be looking for something to charge him with. Presented objectively like you did, I don't think anything would happen to him.
I meant the pink one, thanks :]
He's asexual but not man enough to drink straight from the cup. He is too much of a germaphobe.
It's got the cannonball in the back and everything. Nice
not tonight. jk - i might want to figure myself out before getting involved and hurting other people. 
To add to that, show your SO the Body Mass Index. I think in the US what we regard as normal weight is actually higher then it should be. The BMI, IMHO, helps show a more aproximate healthy weight.  For example, I'm a short guy and my ideal weight should be 130lbs. A lot of people would think that number is too low for a male; but according to the BMI it's just right for me (and I tend to agree).
Same (when not in school). Where are you from?
Your brother looks like the dude from Project X.
&gt;Its not a job, they are in school.  Why is this mutually exclusive?   &gt;Nobody pays me to write research papers and if they did I would be kicked out of my university.  You'd get kicked out if you violated your school's policy on academic dishonesty. If people were willing to pay $50 for tickets to watch you write research papers, why shouldn't you get a share of that money?   &gt;High school sports have an audience as well, do you suggest we pay them.  Yes, why not?  &gt;Peewee leagues have audiences, do we pay our 6-year olds?   Not many people pay to see the games, but if they did, then sure, why not?   &gt;And mind you, you must pay EVERY athlete, not just the ones with the milkable audiences.  In the NBA you get paid, and there's a league minimum. I see no reason why the NCAA shouldn't follow suit.   &gt;Suggesting otherwise is discriminatory and putting these young men and women on an unfair pedestal.  Life isn't fair. 
By that you mean how to crash Imgur?
I hate rules lawyering with a passion.  I mean, like, the entirety of what makes D&amp;D fun is that you have a living, breathing, thinking person there to decide what the rules are whenever you're not sure.  The rules are there to give us a sandbox in which to be free, not to shackle us to the damn books.  Like if I think a DM's ruling is stupid or doesn't make sense, I'm going to politely express dissent and make my case, but "because the books say so" is a horseshit reason.  I definitely understand your hatred for minmaxing if that's your experience with it.  I even agree with you - people who minmax, rules lawyer, then use their godmode characters to bully people are douchebags.  My bad for the hostilities, yo :D
As someone with quite a few Libertarian friends, I just want to say thank you, thank you, thank. For putting into words what I try to explain to them, with regards to the intent versus impact philosophy, because they are busy waiting to retort with another "principle" or "constitutionally speaking..." kind of argument. 
Ultimate Ice Cream in Asheville, NC.
I like Porter Cable/Delta, Bosch and Milwaukee.  However, not everything has to be the same brand.  Take a look at used tools.  There are always plenty on Craigslist.  Do your homework (Google is your friend) on each model and buy accordingly.  All of the better tools can be reconditioned.  New brushes, switches, power cords, bearings, etc. can usually be replaced easily by yourself.  The savings is totally worth it.  Also know that even good brands make cheapened versions for the Big Box stores.  I buy from Westwood Power Tools in LA.  They stock the contractor-grade versions.  They cost a little more, but rarely need service.  We use our tools a *lot.*  We have apartments we work on ourselves.  They get torn down to the studs and rebuilt; we've done this for 12 years now.  I'm starting a small manufacturing business, too, so I've recently picked up a few more.  Don't buy cheap tools.  They break.  Buying one cheapie and replacing it with another cheapie costs *more* than just buying one good tool in the first place.
yes, and if I knew how I'd have done it already.
no...
"I would."-Ron Paul
[] (/scootacheer) Hear, hear! 
I had a roommate who was terribly messy and nearly impossible to deal with.  He would leave bowls of milk lying around the apartment after he finished his cereal.  They would stay there for a week until I picked them up.  Then he would bitch.  I would say "you have to respect everyone's living space," to which he would say "you have to respect my mess!"  Unfortunately he was completely serious.  
Yeah, the Dollar Tree has 3 foot USB extension cables, and my Yeti Mic is like 9 foot. I wanted to get it over to my drum set which is like 20 something feet away. 
oh.  I get it.  It's a fat guy with glasses.  ha.
I know. I was just referring to them using that wording :-)
It's released every time you dream:) so no
When somebody asks you if you're a God, you say YES!
A private school in new england. A lot of people who go to it are also redditors so I'm not entirely comfortable with saying the specific name.
Thanks
this is chopes, there's a pretty severe change in sea floor height as it approaches the coastline. 
Female drummers are super hot! I didn't think that needed to be qualified.
I see no reason why not.
Sounds like your father may need a new attorney.  Unless someone can talk some sense into your mom (does not sound likely though).
Effin Gruven is in Bellmore.... not Merrick...
happens to me a lot as well! but they're not squished up they appear to be swimming on land in mine
Only, we don't club baby seals as it has been illegal for quite some time now :/
I´m not the original poster but seeing that you are the 99% I think I´ll stay with my opinion and be the 1%..  -Chris2
With Marksman, the Revenant makes the Turian Soldier a walking minigun. 
HAHA! That was the most epic description of that game ever! And so right!!  I was worried at a point there but when the final battle you saw that he had 100% control. Is there some bad blood between Nightend and Snute that i don't know about, because that seemed kinda taunting. and mocking. Not that it was BM. but just showing that i am better than you.
"Clearly" in better shape? Have you even looked at Trudeau and Brazeau? Trudeau works out; he stays in good shape. Brazeau trains; he forges his body.  See cyclo's post just above yours, for reference. 
[Här](http://www.webhallen.com/hardvara/kampanjer/d-link_personal_pirate_bay_drone_ppbd-1000/) är en mer utförligare beskrivning.
You mean the market that supplied him with the camera which will exonerate him in court?
Adding Anna Malle to my list of pornstars to look up.
Is that Sibelius 7?  :D
nope. Assuming the weatherman has god like knowing. If it says its going to rain even though he didn't cause it means its still predetermination. 
I can at least listen this time, now that I've got my SR-150 receiving.  (Side note: If anyone has a spare 12AX7 lying around, hook me up!)
Looks like my first build. Solid. 
"op is a faggot"
You really should read the book. I read it before the movie its just a lot different. The book is set from the Chief's point of view which makes it a lot different. And bout the art really? Thats awesome. What were some of the usually subjects or types of paintings/ drawings?
You and your innuendo Nintendo.
Alright, where'd you hide the girl? &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
I have never cleaned any of mine, and I never will.
How do people even notice when they lose karma?
She really sounds like a major odd ball, and I know a thing or two about those.
I could live with a draw. 
how bad?
"Ice fisher" has turned into the 4 queen opening more or less.
What month's issue was this in? Just curious
And here's an upvote.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Xel9sOr99k8
that Caterpie one...  my god
Agreed!  Aveeno Ultra Calming is amazing and mild Has really helped my rosacea.  I love St Ives oatmeal body lotion.  I used witch hazel on my face and aquaphor for really dry spots like my heels and elbows.  That's basically it!
That's not what that means and you know it. Like I said before, what you're doing isn't "crossposting" as much as it is spamming.  Looking through your submission history, only 5-10 of your hundreds of posts in the last 2 months have gotten anything more than 10 upvotes. Clearly, you are not providing quality or interesting content. Many of your posts seem to push a personal agenda, which is the only reason I can think of that you would continue to post so much. You are simply polluting Reddit, and I don't appreciate that.
It was a paper, I had to analyze a menu and critique it.
Dog Groomer.
i still don't see how "tranny" is any more derogative than "transexual." to me it's like saying "willy" is a derogatory way to refer to someone named "william."
And it VERY slowly kills off the people stupid enough to eat it on a regular basis!!! More than 2 birds with one stone!!
[everyone laughs]  [roll cedits]
Dark Iron used to be the server for the penny arcade people so it has some old guilds on it. I wouldn't recommend that one because the horde are out numbered there. Its a pvp server.  Emerald Dream is a pretty chill server, with extremely nice people. The market isn't over priced. It is an rp pvp server put there isn't much rp other than scheduled events. I recommend Emerald Dream honestly. It is a high pop server but I never get locked out. 
As much as I liked Ricky Williams, everything about that guy was a disaster, whether you're a Dolphins or a Saints fan. 
[Vylex - Akuma (Squalid Squad remix)](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZWhTOr9sA0U)
in a tiny persons' shop
[Foto Original del Instituto Electoral de Campeche](http://www.ieec.org.mx/index.php?id=creden), con el nombre correcto: Perez Gonzalez Adriana (que ya se intuía por la clave de elector).   Pésimo manejo del MSPaint :(
hmmm maybe i'll look into it! And yeah I do :D I'm more of a ps3 player than a pc player but i'll pretty much play anything that someone introduces me too. hbu?
Good thing I was eating ground beef when I watched this. Anyone want my tacos now?
This should be posted outside of [/r/Android](/r/Android) because it's relevant to developers everywhere.
very true. but my young self was thinking "stupid bitch"
Me too man, me too
It's a trap
Okay why the move to Cincinnati Mills? I discovered it while making [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HwJwI1gKOW8).
There is no "it", you stupid piece of shit, the article is empty of evidence. All it has is whinging about imaginary oppression.
you've been detected playing the half-life modification "counter-strike". you have been banned permanently from steam.  -gabe newell
IIRC it was from the time when 4chan flooded youtube with porn. The plan was to upload lots and lots of porn as private videos so that they would not get reported and then all at the same time set them to public. One of the youtube comments they got on a video was "i'm 12 and what is this?".
Glad to hear it.  I can't believe all the replies from people saying to just keep riding on it.  When it comes to motorcycle tires, if you have a flat or there's signs of a plug/significant damage to the tread, change the tire as fast as you can. A motorcycle is different than a car considering you only have two points of contact with the surface of the road and if either fails your ability to control the vehicle will be much more difficult than a 4 wheeled vehicle.  Never ride on a plugged/patched tire unless it's to the nearest gas station or in an emergency situation. There's a lot of cheap fucks on reddit with more brains than common sense.  When it comes to your life, spend the $100 on a new tire instead of listening to a bunch of dorky shut-in armchair engineer types.
Sit in front of my computer, slightly smugger than normal.
In the manga I think team rocket combined the three legendary birds.
These pictures are awesome! Thank you!
Yep, nasty habit. Just get some sexy barbells, they suit ya! :)
Fake leather, fake smell.
Recipe for disaster :(
&gt;The problem is that when something is so widely available there is nothing stopping a competitor setting up right next door and suddenly doubling the supply.  That's why you have a contract to sell electricity in a way that makes the financiers happy, so that even if someone sets up next door, you still make money.  And honestly, electrical production has intrinsic value. You can do things with it. Like turn salt water into fresh water and salt. Or turn water and air into gasoline. Or smelt aluminum ores. Etc.
it's probably because the single and multiplayer are kind of connected and origin cant tell the difference of what you're modding or not
1.14 2.straight  3.not at all 4.yes 5.yes
Unfortunately stress does cause significant damage to your hippocampus. And in most cases is unrepairable. There are less dendrites when stress has been long term associated. 
Not sure if gusta...
Hi my name is Peter Griffin and I have dolphin cock
This guy's got a bad feel on the notes. I hate hearing guitarists that can play the notes, but make them all sound harsh.
with his cock..  j/k
Strippers really should use lasers more often.
As a big guy myself, this type of shit encourages me. Upvote for you.
I wonder if you could put a 5th gen front end on a 6th gen. The cycles look practically identical but I am really not sold on the new front :(
WHO THE HELL DOES NOT FLUSH AFTER LEAVING THE TOILET?!?!? Even if not finished??!?!?!
Miltoners wouldn't think twice about such an occurrence..
$30,000 is approximately how much more you will earn in 3 years of work with a university degree than you would if you didn't have one.  If you can't manage that you are an idiot.
A wasps nest... [Full of Spiders??!!](http://images4.fanpop.com/image/photos/21300000/crazy-gif-kermit-the-frog-21358511-146-93.gif)
Assuming you live in the U.S.  You'd be practicing medicine without a license.  In a number of states that's a felony.
We know you made most of your money for the cannonballs through gambling Suomi, don't try to hide the truth.
I feel like I've got pretty good [low bar form](http://youtu.be/2jbgMNVXDZ0)
I looked at the magazine - that's pretty nice.  
Send your money to me. It'll be a better investment after I reinvest it. 
You sir, are a legend.
beat me to it, I shall up toke you anyway. 
indio ftw~!
Good gods some one get that woman a razor!!!
Read more.  Not Reddit either.
Thank you! And all of this stuff was legit nothing was set up. And I don't put a mark on my screen ha
http://www.reddit.com/r/science/search?q=cancer&amp;restrict_sr=on
Can you remarry?
no but you see, it's great exposure, good for the portfolio.
With the close friend, you just wouldn't be "in love", but you would like having them around. Having dated people I wasn't in love with, and now dating someone that I *am* in love with, I personally know what the difference is.
Yeah, I was wondering if geeks even cared about this kinda thing anymore :)
But that's Vodka..... I like jack more myself.
Can I get this in wallpaper form please? :3
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=aMqM13EUSKw  Golf ball hitting Steel
thank you
Awesome!  My fiance was my first kiss, as well.  It's good to know that things have worked out for you both.  I hope I'll be as lucky.  :)
implying misty didn't become a gym leader.
Sure thing! Heading in right now...
HOW COULD YOU?! EVERYONE KNOW PC'S ARE BEST!   YOUR GRANDPA IS AN XBOXFAG!
It is important to note that this is different in other parts of the world, as I have said in previous posts below. 
I bet every one of you in this thread is lily white.
My birthday is also on April Fool's. I'm turning 20 and I was never prank on that day since I was born.
Jump.
or recently aired tires
I honestly just picked the bong up today and have been waiting for something to come to me all day haha   I'm open for suggestions! 
It's all about [r/KungFuCinema](www.reddit.com/r/kungfucinema)
is this april fools....
Is it at all possible that there are difficulties in detecting SP vs MP modifications?
D/L'ed first stable release of Chrome. Had a virus from normal browsing in under 12 hours. Will stick to FF thank you.
 I have medieval total war 2.  Is this as good as that title?
all depends. life affects everyone differently. I've been drinking since I was 12. I'm 45 now. really heavy the last few years. just bored with it I think.  don't really care to stop. but I figure I should cause most of the enjoyment is gone unless I'm drinking with people.
A tiny Red Ryder bazooka... Yes.
The weirdest thing about this AMA is all the people who are flirting with the OP, given the AMA topic.  OP, what's your background like? Do you have siblings? I'm curious about what in your past may have pre-disposed you to become so obsessive.
If a fetal person could be extracted and tossed in a gestation tank and "birthed" later I would be fine with it.
Standard Catz
[](http://i.imgur.com/yEOKE.gif )i hope for the sake of your box that they aren't burnt.
you know what's sad? i saw someone post this on facebook from 9gag yesterday
Errr... you are either religious or nonreligious. By definition. Are you religious? No? Then you are nonreligious. There is really only two sides of the coin on this.  The same goes for theist and atheist. It's the very definitions of the word. Are you a theist? No? Then you must be an atheist, IE, not a theist.
thanks mine is  4169 9699 9162
The cigarette completely ruined it.
I wanted to see more of the GIF...
Must be at the Denver Airport
I found dental school really awful.  Students were treated poorly at my school (unless you had boobs).  It was definitely not fair, and you could not complain about it.  The overworked dental student meme is pretty accurate.  I don't say this to discourage you btw.  
I've seen some pretty badass women boxers in my time.  I used to train at a gym where there were women that could go toe to toe with other guys in their weight class.  Lucia Rijker is a fucking beast.  She used to spar with ranked male boxers instead of females.  I'd say pound for pound she hits as hard as any guy.
yeah i believe that...its so frustrating that what people know about tourettes is that we scream swear words all the time when in reality that is incredibly rare.
There's no point for reporting people for saying "GG noobs" it's not against the TOS and they will never get punished.
What I would do is print out some atheist pamphlets and spread them out at that church. Don't say anything, just walk up and down the isles and pass them out. If they object say, well then stop walking past no soliciting signs and waking me up from my nap.  http://homepages.ihug.co.nz/~edmin/Pamphlets/
The color of his eyes and lips contrasted with his pale skin here is *breath-taking* 
The Internet has made me hate April 1st with a passion.  Turning your web site into a joke is *so* played out.
No. 
The manager of McDonalds needs to project that air of importance to let everyone know that he is big cheese within the store. Gabe is an icon within his industry, at this point almost everyone he needs to worry about will know who he is and respect him because of his accomplishments, not his dress.
Contract herpes and treat your freshman dorm like a game of Pandemic.
It hurts
How so?  Everyone has every possible word they know in their heads.  They have to cut out those words to make sense of thoughts or of what they are saying or of what they are hearing.  Communication is all about information limiting.
All I see is lesbian
http://i.imgur.com/KEJWa.jpg I played around with face swapping aswell after a prom at my school.
so you're saying i have bad overlord placement?! I TRY MY HARDEST MAN.  ;)
&gt; someone else to assume my online identity and carry on whatever I was doing at the time  Extra credit if they *don't know* they've assumed your identity.
If you're looking to share, [Plotbot](http://www.plotbot.com/) has an option to share a script privately or publicly. I haven't used it myself, just heard about it from a friend who thought it was cool.
The engine requires more fuel to stay running at an idle than at higher rpms 
Dropbox link = fail. 
Holy.
Who the hell even reads Playboy anymore?
Fking Amazing.
hmmm, nah, more likely the dog just doesn't take socialist welfare handouts.
not sure if hallucinating or...
Huh. That's odd. I was raised in an abusive environment. I have been in two car accidents that should have claimed my life. I have had severe heart palpitations and tachycardia at the ripe age of 22. I struggled to the point of near-suicide over repressing my sexuality. I have struggled with depression, eating disorders, anxiety... I have watched my mother get her ass kicked by chemotherapy. I have been so poor that I've skipped eating for days. I have literally been at the point that if it hadn't been for the charity of others, I would not have survived.  Not discounting that she's been through some horrible shit, but it's a very self-centered view to feel that because she couldn't do it without relying on God, no one else can go through it without relying on God.  Edited to add: Part of the reason I no longer believe in God is that after years and years of pleading with him to help me change who I am, and solemnly swearing my life in service to him in return for him showing me how to not be gay, how to pull myself out of my depression, I finally realized that he wasn't going to answer me. Interestingly enough, literally as soon as I realized that, and decided that since his prescribed doctrine wasn't working for me, maybe I should try something else, life immediately got better. I got out of the rut I was in and started living my life. No regrets.
Wow, infinite downvotes. Soooo much buthurt, all over the usual repost drama. Let the munching commence!
No shit, point you got!
Penis
Someone once asked me seriously what country in Africa I was from. I'm half Thai and half Scandinavian. 
Im not even going to read this, upvote.
Chandler needs to work on his hook shot. It's always super flat with little elevation.
Even a Glock 19, it is reliable and easy to conceal if you get the right holster... Of course a G26 w¡ll be easier to conceal, but that depends on you and what you wear ;) 
Lol when he points at the dashcam. the lady's facial expression... like someone ate the last of her cookies
I never press those because I feel as if I'm trapping myself.
Is that a spider in the drain?
* In Bruges * Adaptation. * The Informant * Closer  I found all of the protagonists to be interesting and well-developed.
In grocery in VA expect minimum wage and doing more than bagging.  Typically, cleaning anything from a broken jar of pasta sauce to a water leak from a cooler and yes, stores that do not have a company doing restroom work will have courtesy clerks do restrooms.  If you are in NoVA, the comments are not so bad really.  Not like the story here anyway.  If in the Richmond area, it is far less diverse as NoVA, so expect some oddness.
timer
Found one! 
Yeah, the Forever Togethers are pretty rare around here. 
April's Fool.
I just remembered these yesterday, thinking "What were those crunchy things we got on halloween?"  After looking it up and realizing I can't go out and buy a dozen, I cried.
your post is undrappreciated
So if the Irish don't drink and drive, does everyone just walk everywhere or something? I've honestly never seen a sober Irishman.
Once your lease is up they have no obligation to you.
Are you a Trekkie too!? 
Your best bet is to define what you are exactly looking for, this can be hard when you don't really know, so I would suggest checking out a few keynote examples of certain genres. [/a/ loves these pictures](https://www.google.com/search?q=anime+reccomendation+pictures&amp;oe=utf-8&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:official&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;um=1&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;hl=en&amp;tbm=isch&amp;source=og&amp;sa=N&amp;tab=wi&amp;ei=55l3T8KrKoTAgAe56e30Dg&amp;biw=1600&amp;bih=809&amp;sei=6pl3T5H1FcGQgwfBwJHsDg#um=1&amp;hl=en&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:official&amp;tbm=isch&amp;sa=X&amp;ei=6pl3T_izH4r5ggfCqqjxDg&amp;ved=0CEEQvwUoAQ&amp;q=anime+recommendation+pictures&amp;spell=1&amp;bav=on.2,or.r_gc.r_pw.r_qf.,cf.osb&amp;fp=bdabf0a16d78094c&amp;biw=1600&amp;bih=809)  Also, try using myanimelist to find user recs for movies/shows you have enjoyed. Example: [Summer Wars](http://myanimelist.net/anime/5681/Summer_Wars/userrecs)
Rednecks should be called bluenecks in KY.
Neil Degrasse Tyson disagrees.
There was a reply to this comment that said "Motherboards are not usually stored near the keyboard.", and it was deleted because it got to -1. 
It's a hard thing to deal with. My brother committed suicide just a bit over ten years ago. It will never go away. But it will get better. And yes, it will all be OK. 
Dinner was: no talking unless it's to pass the salt/etc, everything is to be eaten (no leftovers), no seconds until everyone is ready for seconds.   This was mostly to have a few quiet minutes as well as to prevent wasted food or food hogging.
I share your cake day, but none of my submissions received more than 10 upvotes. 
I believe I do, it merely took more hyperbolic examples for me fully grasp the concept.
[Source](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hE_OehRLH3s)
Some, but I don't' check out a lot of new stuff....I really like One Piece though ^o^
I agree this Facebook thing doesn't qualify as an example of anything.
lol...hasn't he seen [South Park](http://www.southparkstudios.com/clips/104253/joseph-smith-part-1)? If they wanted to tell the truth, then they would replace the movie shown at temple square with that episode of South Park. What would happen if they started with that? After that showing, simply have the audience vote on what they would like to see next. I don't think it's a fair contest, but count the votes anyway. Ask the audience whether they'd like to see *[Legacy](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ulLvUw-c96o)* or [the musical](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=K5lCYqn2jcs)?  At least Parker and Stone did their homework, on both the South Park episode and the musical.  More seriously...It would be more *amazing* if Smith's purported translation actually matched up with some real world facts. *Name one!* If TSCC could find even one match, it would be shouted from the rooftops. Then it would be worth wondering how he had accurately predicted future archeologic discoveries. *Wow, how did he do that?* But because there are absolutely no matches, the *translation method* isn't relevant. On the other hand, the technique used in creating this elaborate *card trick*, this *long con*, this magnum opus of the *Smith family grift*- that is very interesting. At first, it may appear *the hand is quicker than the eye.* Maybe, the action should be slowed down. Statistical analytics of writing styles give the freeze frame camera tool we need. Rigdon's long life (compared to Smith), his changing theology, and his continuation of delivering sermons and blessings long passed Smith's demise, give the sample that is needed. Why are his  ideas and his writing style found so pervasively throughout the text? It's *curious*, to say the least.^[ref](http://www.reddit.com/r/exmormon/comments/ogjmv/repost_spaldingrigdon_theory_explained_in_70/)
no doubt...he's why I continue to watch, after I got to see my friend as a stand-in get eaten by rats.
Do you want female DW eevee, dark pulse deino or zoroa, hydro pump bagon, exteme speed dratini, or mean look ralts? All i remember having but there might be more
They dont want to lose you. If you get skinny and gorgeous they are worried you will change and maybe want someone else. Your SO effectively is saying they are happy for you to be that weight because it means you wont run off. 
oh wooooooooooooooow, I'm not laughing and I LOVE puns my friend.
&gt;Repost of a repost of a repost of a repost
&gt;I currently do a fair amount of gaming  Not for much longer :P
yes!
Cattle??!!?!?  I'm not from the south!
PSN: Noctorrent
* Shaco (because of the Shaco rule, a Shaco in my team feeds and an enemy Shaco carries)  * Shen (too much map presence, split pushing all day and ult in fights/ganks)  * Rammus (same as Shaco)  * Morganna (her kit is too powerful at my low skill level)  * Shyvana (always in mah jungle stealing mah shit)
Don't you dare try to get between me and my ranch!
"storage" "space" "gigabytes"
You can't post pictures on the internet of me without my written consent!  I'll call the internet police I swear!
Welcome to the vicious cycle of nobility.
wow so many racist comments !
I believe that is a carrier form. There is a chance she has multiple infection forms on-board. *loads shotgun*
[A perfect example... ](http://youtu.be/Jim_HBj7Bdk?t=3m4s)
Because the other 22 are identical in males and females the 23rd pair is what identifies a man and a woman. I thought this was common knowledge? How do you go about figuring out if someone is a man or a woman biologically?
April Fools Day come early, perhaps?      ^^Actually, ^^it's ^^probably ^^just ^^a ^^bug ^^in ^^the ^^code.
Cool! I've not joined the freemasons, I probably will later on. I might even do an AMA depending on how interesting it **actually** is
Used it for about six months, then moved on to Chrome. Never looked back.
*Error: Signal not found* [](http://piq.codeus.net/static/media/userpics/piq_19338_400x400.png)
Say what again motherf@cker! I dare ya... I double dare ya!
In that case you are welcome to punish it at our spot anytime! We are gluttons of punishment ourselves.
Rock Beyond Belief, it was a ground breaking event held today at Fort Bragg, NC by the Atheist/Secular community.  The first of its kind on a military installation.
Denver Aquarium! Those things scared the shit out of me too. I mean, they killed Irwin. 
How would one go about spending time in Siberia?
 Your on!
I'd definitely go Niners in your situation.  But what I think you'll find is you can't just force yourself to have a team that's YOUR TEAM.  That can only happen naturally.  In a way I'm very envious of you.  I wish I could watch football objectively, and just watch for the sake of the game.  Like teams as the team becomes a team I like, and stop paying attention when they fade away.  People would call you a fair weather fan, but really you'd just be a good football fan.
This fucker Zezima thinks he can scam me out of a phat set. We agreed on that shit. You owe me.  Wait a minute, you're Win All Day too? IMPOSTER
The way I feel is that I would sit, have a beer with Striker and talk about wrestling while watching the show. And it would be glorious. Cole and Lawler are two people I couldn't see myself stopping on the street to talk to, let alone have a conversation and a beer with.
I don't think anyone was left without an erection after watching this.
I love that smile
Faggot
&gt;Carrier (new unit) is now available from the Stargate.  Comedic gold!
i think the internet made homeschooling a pretty reasonable option for a lot more families, especially for high school kids.
weed whacker
Came here for this. Was not disappoint.
I read few months ago about secret CIA prison in Bulgaria and I am pretty sure one or two of the pictures in the set are photos of that Bulgarian prison.
That 'boxers' one is absolutely incredible. A million thanks for sharing. 
I can see you're new here - just in case you didn't know you can find it at [/r/fffffffuuuuuuuuuuuu](/r/fffffffuuuuuuuuuuuu) and it's basically a subreddit full of rage comics. Enjoy! 
wow, what a horrible goal song.  good thing the fans don't have to hear it that much
[Here's another.](http://worldoftanks.eu/dcont/fb/1st_april/stz-5-nati_bm-13-16_katyusha/1024_768.jpg) It's fully tracked, so they can allow it, right?  E: oh, already been posted &gt;&gt;
Or dickish older sister. Or rather, vaginaish.
don't hurt me...no more
My question was: What if it isn't a standard tuning? Also, I've played in bands that are extremely detuned and I use 12 gauge strings on those guitars so that I can have a better tone and keep the lower strings from rattling. How do you propose this guitar makes up for that? I'd also like to know how jumping from low to high tunings that quickly affects the body. It could easily warp the neck.
I absolutely agree that it's unfair to judge her; he has no right to attack/accuse her, to treat her differently, to make her feel ashamed of herself or her past. At the same time, though, isn't he entitled to his beliefs? His sexual philosophy that he's lived by? He's not trying to force them on her, after all (i.e., he has no right to call her a slut).   What we have to do is respect both of them: It's unfair to expect him to disregard his feelings. If he's unhappy he shouldn't be shamed into staying in the relationship by being called a pussy and a misogynist. 
So, it has come to this.
Goddammit. adb won't see my Nexus no matter what.
I hated Scantrons in high school. Nothing ruined my day more than finding out I filled in circle 49 for question 50.
Eccleston says he "never bathe[s] in the same river twice", but he has shown an enormous amount of respect for Moffat and has warmed up a bit to the BBC (he's doing a Borrowers mini-series with them right now). He's said he'd do "anything for the children" and would likely be more obliged to join in if they told him that they'd donate a significant amount to a charity if he came on.  Tennant's definitely coming back. He loves the role and only left it because he respects it so much. He's pretty much free (other than being a dad, really) so I'm completely positive he'll be returning.  I don't really see any of the older Doctors coming back portraying themselves, but I'd love to see them take part in some form.  I think bringing back Rose is precisely what they'll do. We can complain all we like but Rose was an important companion and this is the 50th Anniversary. It's the culmination and celebration of the entire series. Everyone who's played a major part so far will want to be included for this historic event.  There are several ways to bring back Rose properly. She's matured and changed quite a bit. Apparently working in AltTorchwood, she's become a bit of a badass. If they don't make a big spectacle out of it (and they've shown that the Eleventh Doctor's pretty much over her) they can bring her and 10.5 back no problem.  Could you explain that last paragraph? Isolate the other Doctors? Meaning they never share screentime? Isn't that a bit against the whole point of a reunion?
Kenny.
I understand your point of view. It's those same reasons that he just irks me. I see him as that annoying big kid. I do love the rest of the crew. It's great that Jones started his broadcasting career with us, though he only played a few seasons with us.
With the variety of alien languages available and the fact that the game takes place hundreds of years into the future, when quantum computing and mass effect technology are widespread and mature, I doubt even Alliance computers are still using anything comparable to Unicode as a standard to encode text.
lick testing 1000 cheerios I think my insides just cringed. For your sake I hope there was honey on them. 
Thanks!
I don't think she should put that on her profile. But she should make it clear on date.
Wow
I'm not okay with this. 
Shhh!  You said too much! 
Next week: Obesity on the rise, leading party scientist Pinkie Pie baffled.
Current doodle, hmm?  Sure it isn't a resistance doodle?  What about a voltage doodle? More importantly, may I ask how one could define such a doodle?  Upon what truths or qualities of the doodle did you make this decision? I look foward to your response.
Waiting tables at Cora. Trying to break the ice with a new table I ask, "How's your day going?". His reply?   "None of your damn business" "[Okay.](http://i1.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/newsfeed/000/082/456/Okay.png)"
My favorite part is that the menu is large enough to have at least 45 numbered meals.
This is exactly how it was done in r/masseffect when people wanted to post spoilers. It's not a new way of posting things and if you don't feel comfortable with opening it at work then don't. It's done that way so nothing is ruined for anyone who hasn't gotten up to that point. As its been said before, nudity is banned in this subreddit  so I highly doubt you'll click on anything that's NSFW. Completely up to you though whether or not you want to click on it
I'd like to change my statement this is what I thought my Sc2 ran it but having tested it it never drops below 70 (this is on my desktop, ultragraphics)
Oh, I'm British so I would have no idea what they look like. Sounds pretty cool though.
Hmm... I was browsing reddit and suddenly i was on a comments page. I also have several tally marks on my arm...
Isnt he in jail on gun charges?
If she thinks everyone who works at a pizza place are "what's wrong with America" then why the fuck was she calling to order?  If everyone who worked fast food quit and got a "real job" there'd be no place to eat.  Lol dumb bitch.
I've said this several times, the biggest problem is the states any team that puts up the amount of money that City, United, Arsenal, Chelsea have always seems to have a larger fan base. It's not the fact that it's the trophies it's the fact that they're competitive. I don't have a problem with it because if you have no ties to the country or team why support a team that isn't competitive. But by definition they are "glory hunters" by supporting a team with a large chance of a successful result in the end.
I think they announced that they would announce something at E3. Or at least they've hinted at announcing something. My guess: More hats. [Here](http://lambdageneration.com/posts/valve-is-attending-e3-2012-in-a-private-meeting-room/) is an article about their presence, which probably means something. 
The goal is neither clarity or confusion. Both require mental activity. Of course, "no mental activity" is also a non-goal.
It'll be expensive to show to much. It'll probably be a lot of running in a dark hallway with frantic music, dany freaking out, and a couple of the storyline-crucial elements maybe. It'll be cool but I am not getting my hopes that high because let's face it, it's a tv show, not a feature film
Dark types are freaking awesome. I need to do an all-dark run sometime.
You need to have buyout prices...
Can you elaborate on how Gomes and Sharp are misunderstood? Not trying to make a point, I'm generally curious. My definition of the word has been skewed by years of people using it to put a positive spin on someone being a dickhead.
This. I couldn't give a shit either way if Scotland stayed or left. If Scotland thinks it can go it alone, their loss. The oil won't last forever, and they might lose a lot of it if Shetland and Orkney declare their own independence, or decide they want to remain with the UK.
Guernica - Brand New First time i heard it was the day I found out my grandmother died of cervical cancer. I cried my eyes out for like an hour. i havent cried in 5 years since
why? just curious, im pretty socially awkward
That is what I'm thinking. I have broken so many keys that at the sites that I've looking at, it will cost the same to buy a new keyboard as to replace 8 keys.
what?
With that much fat he could probably take on any form. 
That video was shocking.
I find that hard to believe, send a tub my way and I'll see what results I achieve. /&amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
You have to bust her on the incorrect use of "their"!
Were you checking the store on the PS3 or on the Vita?
Fuck! Guess I can't listen to motown anymore because multiple people wrote the songs. But yeah, as others have said, Richard Marx? Really?
Jesus: pronounced Hey-soos when someone is named that (my friend had a son named that). Anyways, that is a name you find mostly in deep Mexico, so with them speaking English perfectly and saying "Gurrl" I call FAKE! 
Thanks for the shootout for Backblaze. We're also doing a giveaway...if you install the free trial by April 2nd, we'll pick one person to win a new iPad and five to win 1-year unlimited storage backup accounts. Try it free here: www.backblaze.com/reddit.html  (And, whether with us or someone else, agreed that the important thing is to backup somehow!)
The setting spray doesn't, and its almost as awesome as unicorns.  Seriously.  I work 11 hour shifts and with a few spritz its like magic.  You can get a travel size for relatively cheap (like, 12 bucks) to try it out before going all in. Also, like others have said, powder down! And waterproof mascara.  
Other than what you have- Life, White Collar, Black Books, Columbo, The Defenders.  Out of Practice, 30 Rock.  Arrested Development, The Wire.  Anything with Clint Eastwood in it, or the Lethal Weapon series.
Because it is staring INTO YOUR SOUL!
At least he is a nice tax collector and says happy cake day to people.
that should do it. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ePatJIwB-sI
I think it's still the day before in America.
Had a client call my Filipino friend 'Charlie'
A team?
I was just going to say that, I'm half expecting it to kick in with the distorted guitar and get all epic on us when he starts swinging.
You don't but they're often cheaper, more accurate (due to the fact that weight is removed from the front) and it's always better to train with the same ammunition you use for regular shooting(as the ballistics may be different and affect longer range shooting).   Edit: here's a chart showing how much of a difference a 55 grain vs a 69 grain bullet can make (up to 9 inches at 500 yards just for the example). Also the powder used will affect the velocity and the design of the bullet can affect the accuracy (some weights/powders want more twist in the rifling of a barrel, some want less). http://media.photobucket.com/image/bullet%20weight%20affecting%20distance%20chart/stealthyblagga/3-GunRifleTrajectory.png
pffftchfffft
And that's how the vast majority of lotto winners end up declaring bankruptcy.
As someone of her age, I'd recommend checking her Facebook (if possible), since everyone I know of that age posts alot of comments about unanswered love and such. Might give you a hint on how serious she is.  And I'd like an example of how you told her to stop. If it's just "stop", or even "please stop", it's not gonna work. You need something like "I'm sorry, but we won't work/I love your sister/you're too young, this kind of affection for you that you can't answer, WILL hurt her, atleast if she's serious about it. Try and have her understand that you don't want to be with her, that she deserves someone else, before she fucks herself up. Still be her friend though, but tell her you just like her as a friend/girlfriends relative. Be tough about it, because she's not gonna stop without knowing you don't like it. 
It's not my idea, I am not the OP.  And, again, the concept behind a lot of art isn't immediately apparent. That's why you read about it. Fine art isn't just aesthetics... you have to read about it, discover it, understand it. The artist may leave you clues, and you can debate how well the work translates the ideas behind it... but giving everything away in the first look just makes a conceptual artwork boring and cliche.
I think a lot of that is a problem in how the education system works. More money should improve education at least some but it seems to get lost in a bunch of shit. Like my school received $30,000 dollars one year (graduating class about 60 or 70?) but it was only allowed to be used for lights. We got the most expensive lights possible even though the ones we had were only like 5 years old and worked perfectly fine. In the mean time, our computers were over 10 years old and our economics and history classes used 30+ year old books. All other books where held together with tape and all of them required "book covers" because without them they fell apart. Kids would regularly try to find the books their parents (or in a few cases grandparents) used in school.  Shit is ridiculous.  Not to mention instead of firing bad teachers all the local districts just transferred the bad ones around in a big circle.
That would be awesome For us as well. 
I just smiled. + awwwwed  **Edit** thought I sounded douche with just smiled
So?  IIRC from psychology class, the Baby Albert experiment was conducted when he was under a year old, and conditioned him to be afraid of white furry things. 
ALIEN
Don't do it, man. 
What's with the [F] and [mic]?
My middle school teacher were always on the ball when it came to this. Sometimes we would have our scores by the end of class if everyone finished quick enough. I liked middle school the best. Thought that was probably because we had a awesome computer teacher that let us have BF2 LAN parties between computer labs.
$35 for how much coke? Have they done coke before? If they had they should be able to smell the distinct coke taste/smell and approximate quality from that. Lidocaine is widely used to cut coke, as it's numbing effect mimics that of coke.
I think your name is better than your win streak lol
Besides watching tv/movies, one of the best things to do is to wörter bauen Brücken in unerforschte Regionen.
to be fair, in quite a few languages, the word for lettuce is "salat" or something similar.  also, a friend of mine and i used to call jalapenos "jap-a-lenos" as a joke.
de_eagles is the smallest I can remember playing. It was intense. 
A lot of Russians drink vodka to make their own luck.
Was Poland in the "coalition of the willing" (er bribed)? How many $ Billions of US prosperity did they rake in?
The painting. Once you hit Yoshi, your baby might end up in some kind of bubble! At least that's what Yoshi's Island has taught me. 
Treetop Piru?
I think what atuan means is don't start acting out against yourself. I once knew a guy who has a similar story. Out of guilt he began self harming (cutting and burning himself, drinking, drugs). Guilt can twist you into something you don't need to be. Learn from the situation and make sure you don't make the same mistake again. If she has forgiven you then that is good. If it is still bothering you to a point you can't handle, talk with her and explain yourself more.
I've got about the same DL speed, about 130kb/s. It's not ideal for BF3 by any means but it doesn't break the game either. There are still plenty of servers where I get 40 ping, even when I'm on Skype or Mumble simultaneously. 
I wish I had more advice than just this. Keep on truckin'. Also, check out Craigslist gigs. 
He should cut it off and give it to Lebron's hairline
About 3 to 5 years? I had been saving up for a down payment on a house but I dont see myself settling down anytime soon.
Well it was a long process. I went into the Army out of college into Field Artillery...fast forward after Basic, I am no longer a fundy, just an average person who believes in god, but swears, drinks, fucks, you name it. I did still believe in Creation, but it was more out of habit than actually belief. Fast forward a few years I begin to explore my spirituality, dabbling in the wicca/paganism, buddhism, hindu, no Islam, cause, come on...fuck that lol. Fast forward a couple of years and I discover The Zeitgeist Movie. Even though that movie has its flaws, it opened my eyes, and thats whats important. A year and a half later I am a happy Atheist, well happy would be masking it, life is hard as an Atheist lol
Never having gone there, maybe I am.  But I've seen dozens of 4chan posts here, and have yet to see anything attractive about the site...
Extreme sarcasm. I do this all the time. An idiot in my work group was complaining that the girl he was hitting on must have PMS because she didn't want to talk to him. I just dryly said "Yeah,*that's* why she doesn't care about you, PMS." Then the other guys laughed at him and he backpedaled. 
Just write. Practice makes perfect. :)
I'd say a good third of the time I go to see a movie, there's one annoying group of asshole teenagers that everyone wants to yell at, but nobody does. Have you ever had to deal with these people?
Please excuse nichiatu's behaviour, he's not in the best mood.
also this whole story is from last November. [Source](http://www.rawstory.com/rs/2011/11/23/malaysian-tribunal-finds-bush-blair-guilty-of-war-crimes/) 
Depends on where you live and what you're going to do. For example I've had a principle tell me she'd rather hire teachers from state schools then private.   Where I live just having a college degree gives you a leg up, where it's from is almost inconsequential. 
Why do you feel belittled?  She's not *currently* sleeping with them, right?  
she ate a person...
&gt; i came across the name just recently in a movie review and checked your comment history on a hunch. is he some kind of cineastic luminary or what?  I'll try to make this brief ;)  For me, he is a great interpreter. Joseph Campbell made it his life's work to analyze the world's religions with academic analysis favoring the interpretation of human psychology.  Highlights:   * All religions are factually incorrect, but have central themes that come from the human stages of development and resulting subconscious.   * Non-paranoid schizophrenia, deep artists, LSD and religions come from the same human biology and subconscious.   * Without a supernatural god, there is only the conclusions that humans invented: Love, Compassion, Marriage, etc. All Mythology comes from men, and they have some very powerful things to say.   * Human languages such as English, Spanish, etc are fragments of how the human consciousness actually processes things.  Based on what comes out in art, religion, extreme stress or extreme happiness, it's clear that languages are slow and limiting in our ability to convey to each other the *human experience*, and our related connections to each other. I quote: "The person who has had a mystical experience knows that all the symbolic expressions of it are faulty. The symbols don't render the experience, they suggest it."   * he has many observations on the history of religions and how slow they are to change, and the breakdown of what roles they serve - and what parts are worth keeping and what parts cause suffering and conflict.  He makes the point that artists are like clergy in representing the religion, but do it with a far greater freedom and with different immediate objectives.   * He lived and worked in New York City, also in Hawaii, and he has some wonderful things to say about the ideals of the USA, the Western Individual, philosophy of science replacing religion, etc.  He was educated at Columbia University, the University of Paris, and the University of Munich in Bavaria. He spent his entire adult life as a university professor and teacher on these subject.  He extensively cites his references and is a master of many subjects, including Sigmund Freud, Carl G Jung, Fredeerich Nietzsche, James Joyce, etc. He learned many languages and even translated works directly.  if you didn't already know... Campbell's 1949 book on religion and psychology was the inspiration for the 1977 Star Wars film. He became close personal friends with George Lucas and continued to write about psychology and religion until his death 10 years later. Many other works have resulted.
thank you :) 
I want chicken. I want liver. Meow-mix, Meow-mix please deliver.
I asked a couple of rig hands, they told me they start from $20-22 per hour, and go up depending on experience on the rig. Not sure what they pay up in ND, but I keep hearing stories about how McDonalds is paying 15$ an hour just to hire waiters, because everyone's heading into the oil boom. If that's true, I'd imagine the rig must be paying a whole lot more than just $22/hour. 2weeks on 2weeks off, not to bad if you ask me even if we gotta bear the winter.
Frankly, and this could be my ignorance of the beliefs around here, but what was so awful about what I've been saying?
What exactly makes me a sappling?
I don't think your alternative is viable economically.  And therefore, I believe that the result would be a difficulty on your part to find willing participants, as the engine that is capitalism provides a better alternative for the creation of wealth.
I used to go down to the Greenway and walk down a ways and cut over to the river to go swimming. There are a couple of quiet spots you can go to and go for a dip in the river and not have another person in sight. Very relaxing!  Also, alligators.
It only made sense to me after checking /r/nolibswatch/
IT HAS NOTHING TO DO WITH RELIGION! It's personal freedom. Yes, the reason they want to wear the veil is religious, that's true. However, the issue at play here isn't whether you should be allowed to do something for religious reasons, but whether you should be allowed to wear what you want in public, regardless of your motivation.  A government that bans self expression is evil.
Did he just stop the car in the middle of the interstate or did he pull to the side and let her off on the shoulder? Letting someone off on the shoulder might get you a ticket, but isn't really that dangerous.
In fact, that's a pretty big reading comprehension fail on your part, I'm sorry to say.
The emergence of Bowman and Aldon Smith really negated the need for Willis to get more pressure. Plus he missed a few games. 
NSFW -_-' 
I know I am going to be downvoted into oblivion for this but pink slime is a slang term and doesnt accurately describe lean beef trimmings. That term was coined by a federal microbiologist who was grossed out by it, but the product meets federal food safety standards and has been used for years. The ammonium hydroxide BPI uses is also used in baked goods, puddings and other processed foods. There has never foodborne illness been associated with BPI's lean beef in over 30 years.
Woot, I'll be able to play Diablo 3 on my Ipad!
Its really only because we all have substantially the same qualifications. Half my class (myself included) had never held down a "real" job in the workforce. Rather than get lost amongst the piles of identical resumes, you become "the guy who's really into badminton" or "the gal who backpacked across Mongolia". Five years into practice it would be a different story.
This is the very thing I think every time I see footage like this.
If anyone ever gives you lip, just link them to this.
No shit, right? I hate those pockets. I've tried using them for change, holding a key or two, maybe some washers when working on something, etc. Every.fucking.time. it all falls out.   Now imagine having 5.11 Tac pants with that stupid mag pouch on the left thigh that only 1911 fucks can use.
It's your Cake Day too!?
This is why I love dogs, and dislike cats.
This right here is going to be GW2s main problem. People are going to come in to the game with a huge load of silly preconceptions like this and I am afraid they are just going to bounce off and go back to WoW to play pandas. On one hand we could go 'Good, let the scrubs leave.', but that is not good for the game's growth potential. I wonder if Anet made a mistake using the names 'Warrior' and 'Thief'. Unlike Mesmer for instance, these names come with conceptual baggage.
My celiac's is probably somehow linked to having RA, but a lot of people who cut out gluten see other good results from it, so it could be something to look into, but check with your doctor first. I feel like my energy level has dramatically increased though because of taking it out.  I try to run everyday, especially with marathon season coming up, but there are days that i just can't. If I am slightly in pain, I still run, even if it's just a mile or so, and it sometimes makes me feel better but sometimes it makes me feel way worse. If I ache before I run, I try to take some OTC pain reliever before hand and that seems to help. I'm a really active person, so it's hard to not be and sometimes I over do it though. 
Played this on piano at my sister's wedding in November for her first dance. There were some tears.
1. 22 2. straight 3. no 4. yes 5. no
[Here's the Slashdot post BTW](http://hardware.slashdot.org/story/12/03/31/1914217/software-defined-radio-for-11).  Thanks to  citizenr for plugging this subreddit!
The on board computer plans a profile descent depending on what the company wants.  For a lot of airlines they hold it up as long as possible, power to idle, and descend rapidly (30000fpm+).  What airline was it?
+1 for "Tis"
+3
Or, sweat...ugh 
Those might not all be Apple bloom. Pretty likely, in fact, that there are pictures of babby AJ, babby Mac, and maybe even babby AJ's parents in those.  Granny Smith's a matriarch, you know.
Really the terrible therapist thing again? Cool story
Squigglyvanes is a terrible disease
They are wasted on paper targets, but just to play devil's advocate is there any instance where someone *would* benefit from training with hollow points?  Like Ballistic Gel targets (if there are such a thing) to teach people how to properly judge the effects of the rounds?
Er, it was always my understanding that (for TV shows) the cast are payed at a fixed rate, and any further revenue go towards Director/Producer/HBO?
That would be interesting
You sure about that? Are you insinuating I didnt understand that he meant to say it was too little ketchup?
So anyone in a hoodie is a hipster? Erm... Ok...
I can't help you with your question, but I can show you what happens when you mix molten metal and liquid nitrogen:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rdCsbZf1_Ng&amp;hd=1  **WARNING:** Presenter repeats certain phrases several times :(
yeah, they implemented it when they reduced the number of game activations from five to two.
Are you kidding me? I hope this is real! I'm extremely jealous of the person who happens to see this girl knock on a fucking redbox machine. That's gold right there.
Awwwww that's adorable! The goats cute too, I guess. 
This chart isn't showing sales.
What ails you, my friend?
Better do it then. There's much worse that this out there.
That would be military housing. They probably let whoever charged less do the work.
Same here.
all the down votes are people who are jealous. 
Oh my goodness, please don't think I'm a hipster. I generally don't give a rat's behind what people think of me, but hipster is where I draw the line. I'm a huge fan a Taylor Swift, and she's pretty popular. This is less about questioning popular things than questioning popular conceptions. For example, marathons are considered an extreme feat of endurance, something only for the obsessively dedicated and athletically gifted. The truth is that we are all born with the capability to run a marathon. It is just assumed that we are sedentary creatures. I won't go into the details here, but it's an example.
Don't ask for upvotes, or handouts. 
upvote for artemis fowl.
This is a great story! It deserves to be put in a blog for easier reading and a longer accessible duration, and it also deserves to be on Reddit's front page.  It could be a movie! It's got all the qualities of a modern detective story -- it uses GPS satellites, it has you tracking using a map app, it's fantastic!  Thanks for posting this!
The most recent Burning Team Captain sold for $3500 on SourceOP.
I'm Irish too and it's complete nonsense to think we have any "secret prisons" anywhere. Who could honestly believe Bertie Ahern and Co. were responsible for some black site in Carlow?! I mean, come on...  We're way too small to hide anything from the general public.
i dont have a jazz chorus? i dont know what you're talking about
How about /r/teengers
I work in the meat department at a Chain grocery store that up until a couple years ago was Canadian Owned and operated... Anyhow I was stocking bacon one day and a lady asks me how I can be allowed to stock that. Completely baffled I asked her why not? She asked me if I was an idiot and told me that bacon puts holes in your brain. More amused than I was pissed off I laughed and said "not as far as I know." then she asked me for my manager just to lecture him on the dangers of bacon on the brain... I think that lady had waaay too much bacon as a kid cuz her brain was clearly FULL of holes.
Fallen Earth.  Loads of scavenging for parts for crafting.  It's actually quite relaxing.
Ohhhhhh thank you
I know/you're welcome ;)
Holy smokes, that's a lot of fluff!  I want to know where all these pet friendly workplaces are. I'm jealous!
It's going to depend on the night, but I do not believe the City Park fields see much action on the weekends.  I was just out there for a couple hours and there was no one save the other group of people doing some batting practice and a couple kite fliers.
Here is the text from this meme pic for anybody who needs it: &gt;Title: Clueless &gt;Meme: Awesome Awkward Penguin &gt;* GETS GIRL NUMBER AT PARTY  &gt;* WAKE UP NEXT MORNING AND HAVE NO CLUE WHAT TO DO &gt; ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||GETS+GIRL+NUMBER+AT+PARTY+-+WAKE+UP+NEXT+MORNING+AND+HAVE+NO+CLUE+WHAT+TO+DO)] This is helpful for people who can't reach Quickmeme because of work/school firewalls or site downtime, and many other reasons ([FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/)). More info is available [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/).
SOA is losing =(
I poked my head into [/r/canes](http://www.reddit.com/r/canes/comments/rmb9a/canes_gameday_devils_44286_vs_hurricanes_313116/c474308) to ask about Skinner, and they said it's not too far out of the norm to see retaliation interferences like that, however the unsportsmanlike was a bit beyond the norm.
I know some people with permaban, and they bought lot of rps. Your point is just nosense.
The 0 ring
You kind of have to look for it.  You won't find a bottle that just says "MSG" on it look for something like "Flavor Enhancer" or something along those lines.  But it is available, and it is very useful.  People are really afraid of it, but it's all about moderation.
I'm a male Tabby too, also 2 years old and gorgeous.  I'm silver and gray and my whiskers are white, they fall off sometimes.
Lost their way.
You're a terrific son. As a parent, I know we embarrass the shit out of our offspring without even trying, occasionally being taken by surprise when the youngsters speak up in protest. But be assured, even if it seems to hurt us at that moment, we do process it and understand that whatever it was, it was meaningful enough to cause our kid to speak up, which really does make us proud.
I hate to leave a comment that boils down to "I agree",  but I intuited this myself after several failed attempts at quitting smoking.  Through not telling anybody, quitting smoking became something I had to **do**, not something I had to **say**.  It worked.
if you have a house across the street, the cemetery is like a driving range in your front yard.. my buddy lived across from one when were were little tykes and we would hit old shitty golf balls into the cemetery all the time
You sound more like you have a chemical imbalance. I don't think we're the ones with issues.
Already checked and double checked.
Some more [here](http://www.vulture.com/2012/03/serious-dan-harmon-chevy-chase-beef-on-community.html) but the majority is a rehash but has some low level twitter sniping.
So what would happen if the majority of your users are storing that much data?
In a lot of games, I change the language to german if possible to help me learn. 
Covering that distance though? It looked like Wo Ping wireworks. 
And an ass Id fap to;) thank you for this 
Mark saved me a ton of money when planning my trip to NY
Male prostitute. Sure, there are a lot of downsides. But it's brilliant for networking in the form of blackmail, and you'll develop lifelong skills and relationships that will pay off big after the apocalypse.
It's when you can start prepurchasing.
It's not just EA though. In Starcraft 2 it's the same thing. There are people who got banned for cheating in singleplayer. I think it's because of the achievements -  they want to make sure, that nobody cheats just to get those...
Yes it's still for sale, 380 is the price. Also I forgot to mention I found another game I'm throwing into the bundle It's the Sims 3.  Edit: Didn't realize I DID add the game sorry about that.
When calling a unit, the command element is the 6. The commander is the 6 Actual. The call signs change on a rotating basis. We always referred to our sheets. For example, 7th ID is Bayonet. Division cp is Bayonet 6. Division cg is Bayonet 6 actual. Never ever call for the 6 actual without orders if bypassing chain of command. Never let anyone curse on the net. For that realistic feel, you should have at least one character who immediately dozes off when not doing anything and two who immediately resume a game of spades between tasks. Every outfit I wss ever in had these.
I was 11 years old when *The Green Mile* series by Stephen King was being published in installments.  It was the first book that really stirred me, like I went straight from Ramona Quimby and Nancy Drew to John Coffey.  It's not on my list of favorite books or anything now, but it's easily the darkest and most violent story I can recall from my childhood.   I can't believe no one has mentioned Yukio Mishima! Maybe it's because Haruki Murakami is easily the most popular Japanese author read by Americans now, but he really blew my mind (and not just for committing seppuku after staging a coup he knew would fail). 
Classic atheist text. Russell was a real voice of reason.
Any more pics? I'm very near there now, can't see anything. Dammit.   Edit: I went outside. I got out of bed. Put on clothes in the dark so the mot wouldn't be disturbed. After having read and noted that this was close to april fool's day.   Now, I'm thinking... How in hell does TheClan97 know where I live? 
It's fake: [Source from Tineye](http://www.tineye.com/search/137b1d062560ff54ad0435a73327473a3abfe854/?pluginver=firefox-1.1)  I hate people like this.
I feel uncomfortable for you right now...
New Years.  J/K It's 960x650 according to my google search results using the string "epson moverio screen resolution".  [Here](http://www.androidauthority.com/wearable-android-glasses-augmented-reality-epson-moverio-bt-100-spec-69271/) is one of many articles that provides this information. Sincerely,  The guy who is kind of a dick about googling things for you but does it anyway and is also too lazy to make a novelty account for it.
great color comp!
[H] Dota2, Orcs Must Die, SPAZ, and Guest Passes. [W] CS:GO  http://steamcommunity.com/id/camper_joe
Not to mention its a re-post
fake and gay....
What length tris are you going for? I'm assuming shorter tris, since a CAAD10 is not really ideal for longer ones. Anyways, the longer the tri, the more advantages you'll see from an aero wheel. Personally, I'd shoot for a mix between light and aero.. the Cosmic Elites are aero, but they're tanks.. the Ksyrium Elite is fairly light but not aero. I'd check out something like Reynolds Attacks or some used Easton wheels, or maybe some used Zipp 404s.
The protagonists won't necessarily meet each other but I think events from one will impact the other. 
I switched to a 2-blade razor from the normal 5-blade ones, and that made it better. I'll get more razorburn, which I can get rid of by using moisturizer afterwards, but I don't get near as many ingrown hairs.
And in any of those ranked games as Yi, did you build tanky? Or did you build standard Yi with damage items?  And as for superior kit, Yi has steroids whereas shy has none. Her damage is limited to her base damages on abilities. Higher base damage but lower scaling doesn't mean strictly superior.  What Yi does that Shyvana definitely doesn't is force CC. Shy can be kited after her ult, Yi is much much harder to kite because of slow immunity. He forces you to use as much hard CC on him as possible, and if your opponents are lacking in that, he can use meditate to tank a TON of damage given the opportunity.  As an example, here's a scenario that makes Yi strictly better than Shyvana.  You have Nunu support, and Kat mid. Not only does Yi scale by far better with Nunu's bloodboil, but your opponents now have to choose whether to CC Yi, Kat, or Nunu's ulti.  If you had Shy top instead, all they need to do is use the hard CC's on nunu and kat, and they can still slow and kite Shyvana to at least some extent.
I use it to read novels and stuff. Its kind of hard to keep notes and stuff in it for books you want to mark up because they're stored separately. (kind of like footnotes put at the end of a book)
Yes, with the caret. No password; you have to enter your actual username and password in the shell. Type 'exit' when you're finished and you'll return to the login screen.
I know it's much easier said than done, but don't blame yourself. That's not to say you shouldn't learn from the experience, but don't beat yourself up about it. That's not helping anyone, it's only making you feel worse. Instead, realize that people are incredibly diverse, and that because of that there are many, many people who you could be compatible with. She's not the only one who could have made you happy. Since as others have said, time heals all wounds... give yourself some time. Do whatever makes you happy, as long as it isn't destructive, until you're in a state to think this over with a clear head and find a way to deal with it that makes sense to you.
Also, [Hotel Chevalier](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt1094249/).
Yeah, honestly, no matter if you are a supper star or any other kind of employee, having a boss that disrespect you in front of everyone is unaceptable. Fuck that.  Is the "super abusive on a power trip" hollywood stereotype boss true? (Ari Gold from Entourage, Kevin Spacey in Swimming with Sharks, etc). Because if it really is  then the showbiz world is a really sad place.
My friends and I once went to a sports bar to watch a wrestling PPV. (Judge if you want, I don't care.) We ordered food and beer, and that went fine. Afterwards we asked for water. She just gave us a dirty look and pointed to a half-empty ice-free pitcher on the bar, telling us water was there and we could serve ourselves.  Sometimes, assuming young guys are bad tippers and treating them like shit becomes a self-fulfilling prophecy.
I didn't think anything could be worse than dubstep, you have opened my eyes to Cthulhu-shaming terror.
First time I heard Motion Picture Soundtrack, I just starting uncontrollably bawling.
Oh, that's nothing. Wait till you see this.
&gt;Conservatives played their part in making the bed; now they have to lie in it.  Not unless you can get 5 votes. And we can. So no dope for you. And no insurance for us. Way the world turns, kid.  But on the face of it, your appeals to Wickard and Raich fall on their face. Wickard and Raich were decided the way they were because of the easy ability for homegrown wheat or medicinal dope to enter illicit interstate markets that the Constitution allows the federal government to regulate.  How you get from there to an argument that these decisions allow the government to force people to buy stuff is beyond my comprehension and I presume also beyond the comprehension of the majority of the Court.
&gt;Companies exist to make money. They have tons of people running figures all the time. If DRM wasn't paying off, they'd have stopped a long time ago.  You are assuming that a company can only make good decisions as to the best way to make money, which is absolutely false. Your reasoning flawed; your conclusions fall apart. Their numbers could be wrong, they could be approaching the problem in a bad way, or their solution could be poor. These poor decisions could have consequences that are masked by a complicated market.
shaco, shen, morgana, cassio, janna
Got a text saying: "Don't worry about your test. Pray before you go to sleep early tonight and God will help you tomorrow."
Amen. Just use Imgur if you're going to fucking post an image.
Actually, [it's legit](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Engineering_psychology).
Maybe you should stop adding idiots then, idiot.
just to clarify, it's the *misc* section that is like this.  the powerlifting section has some ridiculously strong guys, athletic section has athletic guys, etc.
http://i.imgur.com/YmZAa.png
That was mean. Allow me to [apologize](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=v4b3MBkOx5k) kind sir.
There's a darn clear line where traditions need to be stopped by any means by anybody, and that's when they violate someone's human rights. If you're not willing to compromise on what basic human rights mean, then it shouldn't be hard to parse out when to condemn traditions. FGM is a good example of the international community coming out against traditions and rituals in some cultures.
I understand.  I love chinese, and have had four cheat meals of take out in three months on keto.  Family orders it, I come home and it's already coming.. I choose to partake.  For me I make it a one meal pig out, and go right back to keto.  I too gain a few pounds and loose them in a few days.  Since I plan for this to be a lifestyle longterm change as opposed to a short term diet.. I'm super excited to be getting closer to my goal, but can't go a lifetime without the occasional carby cheat.  I'm trying to learn to make it work and learn to not go overboard when I do cheat.
$40 from my very first ticket the day I turned 18. Not more than $2 from any ticket since.
i googled searched NES, and this video came up, and I'm obligated to believe google
&gt; ... the high top makes me wonder if it'll be detrimental for ankle mobility  Olympic weightlifting shoes are low tops for that exact reason.
Shit, we're enjoying some self depricating humor and laughing at our own mortality (least I am).  Trying to make it into some ageism(sp?) thing ruins the fun.  Relax, take a deep breath and just... float.  Op is having fun, other commentators are having fun, leave it be and have fun with us.
&lt;insert "La Bamba" as played by a mariachi band&gt;
Yep
http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/asia/japan/3705790/Scientists-develop-software-that-can-map-dreams.html
I can't imagine all-gay school ಠ_ಠ
&gt; Less ~~dropped~~ touchdown passes!  FTFY
I searched for you but couldn't find your account. Go ahead and add me.
I would have personally preferred it if she was jumped by a gang of niggers. 
Yeah i agree with this
Do I get cookies!?!?? I like cookies.
Why are you using Safari? Congrats though.  Did you have 0 already in your bank? I've got 4 banked I can't open yet so I suppose that's hampering my chance of a 5th.
Yes it is!
Shaco, Lee Sin, Morgana, Ahri, Shen
Some of the arguments were pretty interesting. I guess there still is no conclusive evidence of what makes you gay but even if I could change I don't really think I would want to be straight lol  As a not very camp guy coming from a stable home with no history of abuse or really any discrimination from people I know, the points of "How Might Homosexuality Develop? " were funny. I got with loads of girls before I worked out I was gay so I don't get the whole dependency on boys from a young age point and the point that sex is just a stress reliever I will take but it doesn't really take into account emotions or even the possibility that you might be happy.  It just seems to be an impossible fact for them to think that people might be happy living like this and what's even the big deal? Is the assumption that it's a bad lifestyle really just from religion?
I agree with you wholeheartedly about community colleges and the transfer process (already commented elsewhere).  But I want to call you out for talking about the OP so disrespectfully.  It's not necessary to the (good) points you're making, and it's *rude*.  Saying "I would have gotten rid of her a long time ago" is terrible, especially when the entire thread began with her relating that she felt embarrassed about herself.
Dude, sorry you are colorblind and only finding out now.
If EQD (or any other pony site you might visit) has Facebook like buttons or anything else that talks to Facebook, they wouldn't even need to buy that info about you.
Kind of in the same genre, Atmosphere - Yesterday http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qEHTTFOwsDs
I am so glad to hear that I am not the only one that has this problem with the driving! I thought I was just really bad at it, haha!
Good answer C.
I know that it isn't something that was said, but a customer once spit wine over me after I brought it to him. He asked for a beer instead. My boss threw him out. Keep in mind that I was 17 at the time.
Encrypt, encrypt, encrypt?
Really?  I was told feminism was about the pursuit of equality for both genders. You seem to think it isn't.  Your bringing race and sexuality up is a red herring. You seem to think everyone that isn't a feminism must be a straight white rich cis male. That's sort of stereotyping don't you think? You don't know me except that I'm male. That's all.  It's fascinating though in the first paragraph you say you weren't implying it is indisputable.  Then in the second paragraph you state it like it were indisputable fact.
Flick off?  http://aplink.files.wordpress.com/2007/05/flickofflogo.jpg
You'd be surprised how negotiable the FAA is.  Not so much for air passengers though.
Don't be a jerk - If you don't understand what this means, expect to get banned.  No trolling - this is a specific form of being a jerk. It's fine to debate the merits of Dr. Paul's positions even if you disagree vehemently, but keep a civil tone and debate honestly.
Oh yeah. Same deal here with Chicago.   The sign makes it for sure. I wonder if they struggled to come up with something less offensive and settled on 'black people'
I don't understand, what you described is not what a PA's job description is. It's the electric's job to setup lights, and grips work with cranes and dollies. If you are unfamiliar with a piece of gear the best thing to do is let a superior know and have someone who knows show you how to do it properly. This is how people get seriously hurt.
you win the internet for today, good sir.
Reminded me of Independence day when the aliens started attacking earth...
Fucking themed spam account.
Miui does this 
Old people can be such dicks! Just because you can't remember your own name doesn't mean that you don't remember your MANNERS.
According to the round table that was a BS strike, dread strikes will be larger, Titan strikes will be the largest. 
Yup, it's really fog. Whoops.
that is delightful 
Cool thanks for the suggestion, I will check it out.
Lots of things scare girls away from STEM (in US):  * Other girls who are intimidated by different interests * Guys who are intimidated by smart/powerful women * Society which places a premium on the woman as the care giver * Hostile/unfamiliar environment for girls in STEM  It isn't just one of these groups in particular, it's the storm of all these elements and who knows what else that creates this gender gap.
-make facebook status  -wait about one hour  -screenie and post to reddit  karmadecay won't pick it up because it isn't similar enough, and 'technically' you didn't repost.  edit: the guy said something about how this post wasn't on karmadecay
No. There is no way.  Yes, shipping is a possibility, as is a moving company, rail freight, shipping container or a ReloCube. All of them are more expensive. 10 boxes and a car simply does not get you an economy of scale.  1,000 miles = ~50 gallons of gas + 1/3 oil change + minor wear and tear for a typical car. That's roughly $200. Additional gas due to weight from the boxes would be, at most, an extra 10%. That's $220 to relocate you, your car and your stuff. You could easily spend that much shipping 10 boxes.
There was one guy who had a psychotic break sometime in his forties after he had been married for 15 years and had two kids. He would plead with himself to be better.   
She ate 40 cakes? That's as many as four tens!
Ah well, hopefully this meetup gains some steam.
Does any of you know
dragon warrior 2?
At first I thought the mountain on the right could be Elgen in Kvæfjord (my hometown in Norway), given the shape and the elevation of the mountain top your father's chilling at: www.godtur.no/godtur/nyartikkel/multimedia/kvalitet4/5773.jpg  But then again, the landscape in the back does not compute with reality.. So idk. But most definately Norway. Northern or western Norway. 
These three were the first ones I ever got....
Punches in the facial area are known to work, also.
I'm at peace with that.
How busy does it get on say a random weekend? and have you ever had to close because of maximum capacity?
Is posting an AMA your way of promoting the book?  (On that note, it sounds super interesting)
You're forgetting the separate paypal payments that don't show up on kickstarter.  edit: okay they didnt make that much from paypal lol
 I never said anything about a baby.  &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;  I see we have nothing more to talk about.
^It's not just limited to 1 and 0, it can be neither 1 or 0, it can be anything in between 1 and 0. This is called a super-position. Because we don't know what state that atom is at, its at all states and no states at the same time. When we collapse the reality, it will still only be a 0 or 1, because the state of the atom is determined by the electrons of that atom. I am uncertain as to whether a collapsed reality can be 01, or -- in the quantum computing world, but a collapsed reality cannot be anything in between 0 and 1.  But should we be able to have a collapsed bit reading of 01 or --, thats two new states for our computers to work with, doubling the amount of information kept in one bit (aka 0, 1, 01 or -- instead of 0 or 1)  Binary code plays out like this  0000 - 0001 - 0010 - 0011 - 0100 - 0101 - 0110 - 0111 - 1000 - 1001 - 1010 - 1011 - 1100 - 1101 - 1110 - 1111  It's a base-two number system. With four states, we can move to a base-four number system for our computers (or quadinary?) Of  0000 - 0001 - 0002 - 0003 - 0010 - 0011 - 0012 - 0013 - 0020 - 0021 - 0022 - 0023 - 0030 - 0031 - 0032 - 0033 - 0100 - 0101 - 0102 - 0103 - 0110 - 0111 - 0112 - 0113 - 0120 - 0121 - 0122 - 0123 -0130 - 0131 - 0132 - 0133 - 0200 - 0201 - 0202 - 0203 - 0210 - 0211 - 0212 - 0213 - 0220 - 0221 - 0222 - 0223 - 0230 - 0231 - 0232 - 0233 - 0300 - 0301 - 0302 - 0303 - 0310 - 0311 - 0312 - 0313 - 0320 - 0321 - 0322 - 0323 - 1000 (etc. etc. etc.)  This is where most (if not all) of the potential computing power of quantum computers comes from See Double-Slit Experiment  Quantum Physics Uncertainty Principle   This raises questions about the usability of magnetic hard drives (limited to binary for N or S) in a quantum computing environment. Could always do base-4 to base-2 conversions, but those numbers will become big QUICK, a 1TB hard drive would probably seem as big as a GB
Why English? Surely one of the languages of china might have been better to learn....then you could pretend to grant wishes when they attempt to eat you.
hahaha good hustle
Overlooked is musician. Overrated is doctor.
So he'll be an Oriole soon
Nice site, will be checking it out in future
Check out the amc building at yonge and dundas there's google guys there! [http://g.co/maps/6vykd](http://g.co/maps/6vykd)
I agree with the man. Too many Mexicans and Blacks pumping out dumb children. How is this country going to survive as a first world nation with this less intelligent population?
&gt; Einstein's approach does not fall under science.  Yeah like testing and stuff is totally not science!  Your pseudo-intellectual criticisms isn't doing you any favors.  It doesn't help pretending to be knowledgeable on the subject, while being oblivious to great lengths Einstein went to demonstrate the validity of his theories by tests and predictions.  That is most definitely science.
WINDIRSTAT is the best file viewer I've seen for this kind of issue.
Lol, this is awesome. What is it from?
I for one would like my machine to last longer than a year. 
I would buy this in a heartbeat. That would be so cool. 
Every time I witness somebody carelessly approach a spider, wasp, [etc](http://i.imgur.com/jtcUo.jpg), I don't find them brave. I conclude that they haven't reached my level of evolution yet, and lack basic survival instincts. It makes me feel less like a bitch. This post has furthered my justification.
Hey TARGARYEN, will you all try to be online **Sunday night at 11pm EST / 8pm PST** to play STARK?  It's our best free day yet!
There's a whole set of [restrictions/Parental](https://support.apple.com/kb/ht4213) controls on your iPad - 
I don't know why, but it really bothers the fuck out of me when theists cain atheists are devil worshippers.  How can we worship the fictional arch-nemesis of an imaginary being?  It's not that hard fucktards, being an atheist means not believing in god/s (which includes all the minor gods/angels).
You might try r/fitness
But one stupid motherfucker WILL buy this. Make no mistake. This makes it worthwhile adding. People are idiots. Think of some of the santorum supporters. They have unlimited money and want the best. They want the most expensive thing on the market, and that's it. This guy only needs one sale to make it worthwhile, and there is enough idiots in the world to ensure he gets at least one.
And you're the king of making claims without backing yourself up once.  Also, I'm not your pal, friend.
I only got the short one. It was quick and easy. Thanks. 
Step 1: Build a chest Step 2: throw your inventory into it Step 3: repeat  When you want something, keep looking and hope
BS it's a C4D render I did years ago   [Proof](http://imgur.com/spYqw)
you spell "woah" wrong.
Let's slay some fucking Unicorns
It probably was, but what does that have to do with this?
Supposedly I also won a Vita from Taco Bell. I'll believe it when I see it in my mailbox.
The orangier, the better.
I honestly believe this might be the most accurate assesment. The content is taking too long to come. Especially for things that should have been there long ago.  Hopefully in the long run they get this sorted out, but it's a rough start for sure.
The Shredder.
&gt;If Bioware does redo the ending it's never going to satisfy anyone, because the ending will never be experienced in the optimal psychological space.  It was just Brooke asking Tom questions. They touched on the extremes of the reactions from naive to "rageaholic". Read Dead Redemption had a great ending.  That's pretty much it.
Nifty!
M27 IAR BY FAR. With 200 Rounds extended mags and the accuracy of an assault rifle, this is the gun to beat!
"The day I realized my childhood ended was when the judge told me 'You will be trialed as an adult.'" - Kearney Zzyzwicz
What's the ip address?
Here I thought the USA was a world leader in corrupt high officials...
Wow now that's a watch I'd buy.
How did he..did he..no..WTF!
haha this made me laugh really hard for some reason. 
Pirate all games by EA.
Lol, too lazy to get out their own paper. &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
PC Master Race?
[Nope.](http://i.imgur.com/REr2W.gif)
where. where to i get this. i must have it.
Pretty sure he's in jail... http://rapfix.mtv.com/2012/03/06/ja-rule-reprimanded-for-phone-interview-in-jail/
Yeah. I think Kimcheekumquat killed a guy.
brb, hunting some mexicans
This.  I don't know anybody that would be happy to be filmed without prior permission.
What is the best way to backup my almost full external TB drive?  I want to buy a 2tb drive because i am almost due but I can't afford 1 let alone 2!?!?!
Passing out cards? Poker!
People don't like it when people say Thin girls are attractive, its comparable to being racist.
What did you actually say to her?
Wow this is really great! Thanks for the reply. I'm in a completely unrelated field from business currently, but this gives me many ideas about the future. You give very good advice on finding and developing relationships with mentors. Thank you kind sir.
Sorry you don't pass to me.  But you are close.  Really the biggest issues are eyebrows (wax/thread/pluck them please), and upper lip shadow, which can be lasered.  You're also only 6 months on HRT, so give that a little more time too.  You'll get there eventually, don't worry.
http://i.imgur.com/2jZ6B.jpg  And boom goes the dynamite!
Sure does seem that way, doesn't it? I wouldn't be replying to yours if I wasn't getting notifications. Give me a few hours to get off work. I'll answer any questions. Promise. 
I think maybe what they're trying to get at is although humanity's primary instinct is to continue to survive (which is a dangerous justification), since we are a little 'smarter' than other mammals we can choose whether or not we want to procreate. Each side of the story is equal and is now an 'opinion' rather than a 'fact', so there's no use arguing about it.  I don't really understand Jizzbatsupremegoth's comment either, just trying to look at things from their perspective, and add to the discussion. 
Be straight up and tell him how you feel. What may seem as "obvious hints to back off" to a girl may seem like nothing to a guy.
neomed! ohio rocks.
Why would they ban you for modding Skyrim. Steam workshop offers [Skyrim Mods](http://steamcommunity.com/workshop/browse?appid=72850).
Valid point, but it's still the case that there often seems to be discussion over who should take a kick. I always wonder what they're saying...  "I can kick the ball into that corner." "Well, yeah I see what you're saying BUT- there's also that corner... I could kick it there." "This is a toughie. Rock paper scissors?"
You asked for *factual information,* not opinions. Please learn the difference.
I have the HTC Inspire and my Lady has the Inspire Both awesome phones. HTC inspire in my opinion is more powerful,solid aluminum feeling device. The Infuse is extremely light plastic feeling but runs like the Galaxy Devices. Also has a front facing camera and Battery life far more superior to anything I have seen in a smart phone. I just can't deal with the plastic toy like feeling.. I'd eliminate the Captivate form your options. I had that prior to the Inspire It's a step down from the Infuse or Inspire.. Good Luck on your decision hope this helped. 
I kinda like Garrett Hedlund, but without facial hair. And that's only based on looks because I honestly don't know much about him as an actor. 
Are you trying to imply that Ron Paul is inconsistent? I disagree with him on most issues but he is by far the most ideologically consistent of the GOP candidate.
She could make an outfit of hair and still have enough style it
it's the derpstar!
Quiet state, you're a hat!
My mother has an IQ of 145 and is a teacher. She thinks you get vira on your computer simply by browsing the Internet. Just having sites like Facebook open.
